Policy summary
Personal Data processed for the following purposes and using the following services:
Analytics
Google Analytics for Firebase (for apps)
Personal Data: Application opens; Application updates; device information; geography/region; in-app purchases; launches; number of sessions; operating systems; session duration; Trackers; Usage Data
Beta Testing
Google Play Beta Testing
Personal Data: country; Data communicated while using the service; device information; device logs; various types of Data as specified in the privacy policy of the service
Contacting the User
Contact form
Personal Data: email address; first name; last name; User ID
Data transfer outside the EU
Data transfer from the EU and/or Switzerland to the U.S based on Privacy Shield and Data transfer to countries that guarantee European standards
Personal Data: various types of Data
Device permissions for Personal Data access
Device permissions for Personal Data access
Personal Data: Approximate location permission (non-continuous)
Handling payments
Payments processed via the Apple App Store and Payments processed via the Google Play Store
Personal Data: device information; purchase history; Usage Data
Hosting and backend infrastructure
Google Cloud Storage
Personal Data: various types of Data as specified in the privacy policy of the service
Location-based interactions
Non-continuous geolocation
Personal Data: geographic position
Managing contacts and sending messages
Firebase Cloud Messaging and Firebase Notifications
Personal Data: various types of Data as specified in the privacy policy of the service
Platform services and hosting
App Store Connect
Personal Data: diagnostics; purchase history; Universally unique identifier (UUID); Usage Data
Google Play Store
Personal Data: Usage Data
Social features
Inviting and suggesting friends
Personal Data: various types of Data
SPAM protection
Google reCAPTCHA
Personal Data: answers to questions; clicks; keypress events; motion sensor events; mouse movements; scroll position; touch events; Trackers; Usage Data
Traffic optimization and distribution
Google Cloud CDN
Personal Data: Usage Data
Further information about the processing of Personal Data
User identification via a universally unique identifier (UUID)
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may track Users by storing a so-called universally unique identifier (or short UUID) for analytics purposes or for storing Users' preferences. This identifier is generated upon installation of this Application, it persists between Application launches and updates, but it is lost when the User deletes the Application. A reinstall generates a new UUID.
Access the address book
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may request access to your address book.
Push notifications
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may send push notifications to the User to achieve the purposes outlined in this privacy policy.
Users may in most cases opt-out of receiving push notifications by visiting their device settings, such as the notification settings for mobile phones, and then change those settings for Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos, some or all of the apps on the particular device.
Users must be aware that disabling push notifications may negatively affect the utility of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
Unique device identification
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may track Users by storing a unique identifier of their device, for analytics purposes or for storing Users' preferences.
Equal protection of User Data
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos shares User Data only with third parties carefully selected to ensure that they provide the same or equal protection of User Data as stated in this privacy policy and requested by applicable data protection laws. Further information on data processing and privacy practices by third parties can be found in their respective privacy policies.
Push notifications based on the User's geographic location
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may use the User's geographic location to send push notifications for the purposes outlined in this privacy policy.
Users may in most cases opt-out of receiving push notifications by visiting their device settings, such as the notification settings for mobile phones, and then changing those settings for some or all of the apps on the particular device.
Users must be aware that disabling push notifications may negatively affect the utility of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
Contact information
Owner and Data Controller
Nico Tranquilli
Owner contact email:
nico@tranquilli.org
Full policy
Owner and Data Controller
Nico Tranquilli
Owner contact email:
nico@tranquilli.org
Types of Data collected
Among the types of Personal Data that Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos collects, by itself or through third parties, there are:
      geographic position; various types of Data; Usage Data; Trackers; answers to questions; clicks; keypress events; motion sensor events; mouse movements; scroll position; touch events; first name; last name; email address; User ID; Approximate location permission (non-continuous); diagnostics; purchase history; Universally unique identifier (UUID); device information; country; Data communicated while using the service; device logs; geography/region; number of sessions; session duration; in-app purchases; Application opens; Application updates; launches; operating systems.
Complete details on each type of Personal Data collected are provided in the dedicated sections of this privacy policy or by specific explanation texts displayed prior to the Data collection.
Personal Data may be freely provided by the User, or, in case of Usage Data, collected automatically when using Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
Unless specified otherwise, all Data requested by Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos is mandatory and failure to provide this Data may make it impossible for Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos to provide its services. In cases where Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos specifically states that some Data is not mandatory, Users are free not to communicate this Data without consequences to the availability or the functioning of the Service.
Users who are uncertain about which Personal Data is mandatory are welcome to contact the Owner.
Any use of Cookies – or of other tracking tools — by Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos or by the owners of third-party services used by Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos serves the purpose of providing the Service required by the User, in addition to any other purposes described in the present document.
Users are responsible for any third-party Personal Data obtained, published or shared through Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
Mode and place of processing the Data
Methods of processing
The Owner takes appropriate security measures to prevent unauthorized access, disclosure, modification, or unauthorized destruction of the Data.
The Data processing is carried out using computers and/or IT enabled tools, following organizational procedures and modes strictly related to the purposes indicated. In addition to the Owner, in some cases, the Data may be accessible to certain types of persons in charge, involved with the operation of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos (administration, sales, marketing, legal, system administration) or external parties (such as third-party technical service providers, mail carriers, hosting providers, IT companies, communications agencies) appointed, if necessary, as Data Processors by the Owner. The updated list of these parties may be requested from the Owner at any time.
Place
The Data is processed at the Owner's operating offices and in any other places where the parties involved in the processing are located.
Depending on the User's location, data transfers may involve transferring the User's Data to a country other than their own. To find out more about the place of processing of such transferred Data, Users can check the section containing details about the processing of Personal Data.
Retention time
Unless specified otherwise in this document, Personal Data shall be processed and stored for as long as required by the purpose they have been collected for and may be retained for longer due to applicable legal obligation or based on the Users’ consent.
The purposes of processing
The Data concerning the User is collected to allow the Owner to provide its Service, comply with its legal obligations, respond to enforcement requests, protect its rights and interests (or those of its Users or third parties), detect any malicious or fraudulent activity, as well as the following:
        Location-based interactions, Social features, Hosting and backend infrastructure, SPAM protection, Data transfer outside the EU, Contacting the User, Device permissions for Personal Data access, Platform services and hosting, Handling payments, Beta Testing, Managing contacts and sending messages, Traffic optimization and distribution and Analytics.
For specific information about the Personal Data used for each purpose, the User may refer to the section “Detailed information on the processing of Personal Data”.
Device permissions for Personal Data access
Depending on the User's specific device, Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may request certain  permissions that allow it to access the User's device Data as described below.
By default, these permissions must be granted by the User before the respective information can be accessed. Once the permission has been given, it can be revoked by the User at any time. In order to revoke these permissions, Users may refer to the device settings or contact the Owner for support at the contact details provided in the present document.
The exact procedure for controlling app permissions may be dependent on the User's device and software.
Please note that the revoking of such permissions might impact the proper functioning of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
If User grants any of the permissions listed below, the respective Personal Data may be processed (i.e accessed to, modified or removed) by Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
Approximate location permission (non-continuous)
Used for accessing the User's approximate device location. Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may collect, use, and share User location Data in order to provide location-based services.
The geographic location of the User is determined in a manner that isn't continuous. This means that it is impossible for Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos to derive the approximate position of the User on a continuous basis.
Detailed information on the processing of Personal Data
Personal Data is collected for the following purposes and using the following services:
Analytics
The services contained in this section enable the Owner to monitor and analyze web traffic and can be used to keep track of User behavior.
Google Analytics for Firebase (for apps)
Google Analytics for Firebase (for apps) or Firebase Analytics is an analytics service provided by Google LLC or by Google Ireland Limited, depending on how the Owner manages the Data processing.
In order to understand Google's use of Data, consult
Google's partner policy
.
Firebase Analytics may share Data with other tools provided by Firebase, such as Crash Reporting, Authentication, Remote Config or Notifications. The User may check this privacy policy to find a detailed explanation about the other tools used by the Owner.
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos uses identifiers for mobile devices and technologies similar to cookies to run the Firebase Analytics service.
Users may opt-out of certain Firebase features through applicable device settings, such as the device advertising settings for mobile phones or by following the instructions in other Firebase related sections of this privacy policy, if available.
Personal Data processed: Application opens; Application updates; device information; geography/region; in-app purchases; launches; number of sessions; operating systems; session duration; Trackers; Usage Data.
Place of processing:  United States –
Privacy Policy
;  Ireland –
Privacy Policy
.
Beta Testing
This type of service makes it possible to manage User access to Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos, or parts of it, for the purpose of testing a certain feature or the entire Application.
The service provider may automatically collect data related to crashes and statistics related to the User's use of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos in a personally identifiable form.
Google Play Beta Testing (Google Ireland Limited)
Google Play Beta Testing is a beta testing service provided by Google Ireland Limited.
Personal Data processed: country; Data communicated while using the service; device information; device logs; various types of Data as specified in the privacy policy of the service.
Place of processing:  Ireland –
Privacy Policy
.
Contacting the User
Contact form (Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos)
By filling in the contact form with their Data, the User authorizes Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos to use these details to reply to requests for information, quotes or any other kind of request as indicated by the form’s header.
Personal Data processed: email address; first name; last name; User ID.
Data transfer outside the EU
The Owner is allowed to transfer Personal Data collected within the EU to third countries (i.e. any country not part of the EU) only pursuant to a specific legal basis. Any such Data transfer is based on one of the legal bases described below.
Users can inquire with the Owner to learn which legal basis applies to which specific service.
Data transfer from the EU and/or Switzerland to the U.S based on Privacy Shield (Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos)
If this is the legal basis, the transfer of Personal Data from the EU or Switzerland to the US is carried out according to the EU - U.S. and Swiss - U.S. Privacy Shield.
In particular, Personal Data is transferred to services that self-certify under the Privacy Shield framework and therefore guarantee an adequate level of protection of such transferred Data. All services are listed within the relevant section of this document and those that adhere to Privacy Shield can be singled out by checking their privacy policy and possibly also by specifically checking for Privacy Shield adherence in the official Privacy Shield List.
Privacy Shield also specifically guarantees rights to Users which can be found in its most current form on the website run by the US Department of Commerce.
Personal Data may be transferred from within the EU or Switzerland to the U.S. to services that are not, or not anymore, part of Privacy Shield, only based on other valid legal grounds. Users can ask the Owner to learn about such legal grounds.
Personal Data processed: various types of Data.
Data transfer to countries that guarantee European standards (Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos)
If this is the legal basis, the transfer of Personal Data from the EU to third countries is carried out according to an adequacy decision of the European Commission.
The European Commission adopts adequacy decisions for specific countries whenever it considers that country to possess and provide Personal Data protection standards comparable to those set forth by EU data protection legislation. Users can find an updated list of all adequacy decisions issued on the European Commission's website.
Personal Data processed: various types of Data.
Device permissions for Personal Data access
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos requests certain permissions from Users that allow it to access the User's device Data as described below.
Device permissions for Personal Data access (Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos)
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos requests certain permissions from Users that allow it to access the User's device Data as summarized here and described within this document.
Personal Data processed: Approximate location permission (non-continuous).
Handling payments
Unless otherwise specified, Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos processes any payments by credit card, bank transfer or other means via external payment service providers. In general and unless where otherwise stated, Users are requested to provide their payment details and personal information directly to such payment service providers.   Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos isn't involved in the collection and processing of such information: instead, it will only receive a notification by the relevant payment service provider as to whether payment has been successfully completed.
Payments processed via the Apple App Store (Apple Inc.)
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos uses a payment service provided by Apple Inc. that allows the Owner to offer the purchase of the app itself or in-app purchases.
Personal Data processed to complete the purchases are processed by Apple, as described in the
privacy policy for the App Store
.
Personal Data processed: device information; purchase history; Usage Data.
Place of processing:  United States –
Privacy Policy
.
Payments processed via the Google Play Store (Google Ireland Limited)
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos uses a payment service provided by Google Ireland Limited that allows the Owner to offer the purchase of the app itself or in-app purchases.
Personal Data processed to complete the purchases are processed by Google, as described in the
privacy policy for the Google Play store
.
Personal Data processed: device information; purchase history; Usage Data.
Place of processing:  Ireland –
Privacy Policy
.
Hosting and backend infrastructure
This type of service has the purpose of hosting Data and files that enable Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos to run and be distributed as well as to provide a ready-made infrastructure to run specific features or parts of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
Some of these services work through geographically distributed servers, making it difficult to determine the actual location where the Personal Data are stored.
Google Cloud Storage
Google Cloud Storage is a hosting service provided by Google LLC or by Google Ireland Limited, depending on how the Owner manages the Data processing.
Personal Data processed: various types of Data as specified in the privacy policy of the service.
Place of processing:  United States –
Privacy Policy
;  Ireland –
Privacy Policy
.
Location-based interactions
Non-continuous geolocation (Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos)
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may collect, use, and share User location Data in order to provide location-based services.
Most browsers and devices provide tools to opt out from this feature by default. If explicit authorization has been provided, the User’s location data may be tracked by Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
The geographic location of the User is determined in a manner that isn't continuous, either at the specific request of the User or when the User doesn't point out its current location in the appropriate field and allows the application to detect the position automatically.
Personal Data processed: geographic position.
Managing contacts and sending messages
This type of service makes it possible to manage a database of email contacts, phone contacts or any other contact information to communicate with the User.
These services may also collect data concerning the date and time when the message was viewed by the User, as well as when the User interacted with it, such as by clicking on links included in the message.
Firebase Cloud Messaging (Google Ireland Limited)
Firebase Cloud Messaging is a message sending service provided by Google Ireland Limited. Firebase Cloud Messaging allows the Owner to send messages and notifications to Users across platforms such as Android, iOS, and the web. Messages can be sent to single devices, groups of devices, or specific topics or User segments.
Personal Data processed: various types of Data as specified in the privacy policy of the service.
Place of processing:  Ireland –
Privacy Policy
.
Firebase Notifications (Google LLC)
Firebase Notifications is a message sending service provided by Google LLC. Firebase Notifications can be integrated with Firebase Analytics to target analytics-based audiences and track opening and conversion events.
Personal Data processed: various types of Data as specified in the privacy policy of the service.
Place of processing:  Ireland –
Privacy Policy
.
Platform services and hosting
These services have the purpose of hosting and running key components of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos, therefore allowing the provision of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos from within a unified platform. Such platforms provide a wide range of tools to the Owner  –  e.g. analytics, user registration, commenting, database management, e-commerce, payment processing – that imply the collection and handling of Personal Data.
Some of these services work through geographically distributed servers, making it difficult to determine the actual location where the Personal Data are stored.
App Store Connect (Apple Inc.)
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos is distributed on Apple's App Store, a platform for the distribution of mobile apps, provided by Apple Inc.
App Store Connect enables the Owner to manage Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos on Apple's App Store. Depending on the configuration, App Store Connect provides the Owner with analytics data on user engagement and app discovery, marketing campaigns, sales, in-app purchases, and payments to measure the performance of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
App Store Connect only collects such data from Users who have agreed to share them with the Owner. Users may find more information on how to opt out via their device settings
here
.
Personal Data processed: diagnostics; purchase history; Universally unique identifier (UUID); Usage Data.
Place of processing:  United States –
Privacy Policy
.
Google Play Store (Google Ireland Limited)
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos is distributed on the Google Play Store, a platform for the distribution of mobile apps, provided by Google Ireland Limited.
By virtue of being distributed via this app store, Google collects usage and diagnostics data and share aggregate information with the Owner. Much of this information is processed on an opt-in basis.
Users may opt-out of this analytics feature directly through their device settings. More information on how to manage analysis settings can be found on
this page
.
Personal Data processed: Usage Data.
Place of processing:  Ireland –
Privacy Policy
.
Social features
Inviting and suggesting friends (Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos)
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may use the Personal Data provided to allow Users to invite their friends - for example through the address book, if access has been provided - and to suggest friends or connections inside it.
Personal Data processed: various types of Data.
SPAM protection
This type of service analyzes the traffic of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos, potentially containing Users' Personal Data, with the purpose of filtering it from parts of traffic, messages and content that are recognized as SPAM.
Google reCAPTCHA
Google reCAPTCHA is a SPAM protection service provided by Google LLC or by Google Ireland Limited, depending on how the Owner manages the Data processing.
The use of reCAPTCHA is subject to the Google
privacy policy
and
terms of use
.
In order to understand Google's use of Data, consult
Google's partner policy
.
Personal Data processed: answers to questions; clicks; keypress events; motion sensor events; mouse movements; scroll position; touch events; Trackers; Usage Data.
Place of processing:  United States –
Privacy Policy
;  Ireland –
Privacy Policy
.
Traffic optimization and distribution
This type of service allows Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos to distribute their content using servers located across different countries and to optimize their performance.
Which Personal Data are processed depends on the characteristics and the way these services are implemented. Their function is to filter communications between Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos and the User's browser.
Considering the widespread distribution of this system, it is difficult to determine the locations to which the contents that may contain Personal Information of the User are transferred.
Google Cloud CDN (Google Ireland Limited)
Google Cloud CDN is a traffic optimization and distribution service provided by Google Ireland Limited.
Personal Data processed: Usage Data.
Place of processing:  Ireland –
Privacy Policy
.
Further information about the processing of Personal Data
User identification via a universally unique identifier (UUID)
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may track Users by storing a so-called universally unique identifier (or short UUID) for analytics purposes or for storing Users' preferences. This identifier is generated upon installation of this Application, it persists between Application launches and updates, but it is lost when the User deletes the Application. A reinstall generates a new UUID.
Access the address book
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may request access to your address book.
Push notifications
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may send push notifications to the User to achieve the purposes outlined in this privacy policy.
Users may in most cases opt-out of receiving push notifications by visiting their device settings, such as the notification settings for mobile phones, and then change those settings for Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos, some or all of the apps on the particular device.
Users must be aware that disabling push notifications may negatively affect the utility of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
Unique device identification
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may track Users by storing a unique identifier of their device, for analytics purposes or for storing Users' preferences.
Equal protection of User Data
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos shares User Data only with third parties carefully selected to ensure that they provide the same or equal protection of User Data as stated in this privacy policy and requested by applicable data protection laws. Further information on data processing and privacy practices by third parties can be found in their respective privacy policies.
Push notifications based on the User's geographic location
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may use the User's geographic location to send push notifications for the purposes outlined in this privacy policy.
Users may in most cases opt-out of receiving push notifications by visiting their device settings, such as the notification settings for mobile phones, and then changing those settings for some or all of the apps on the particular device.
Users must be aware that disabling push notifications may negatively affect the utility of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
Further Information for Users
Legal basis of processing
The Owner may process Personal Data relating to Users if one of the following applies:
Users have given their consent for one or more specific purposes.
provision of Data is necessary for the performance of an agreement with the User and/or for any pre-contractual obligations thereof;
processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which the Owner is subject;
processing is related to a task that is carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of official authority vested in the Owner;
processing is necessary for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by the Owner or by a third party.
In any case, the Owner will gladly help to clarify the specific legal basis that applies to the processing, and in particular whether the provision of Personal Data is a statutory or contractual requirement, or a requirement necessary to enter into a contract.
Further information about retention time
Unless specified otherwise in this document, Personal Data shall be processed and stored for as long as required by the purpose they have been collected for and may be retained for longer due to applicable legal obligation or based on the Users’ consent.
Therefore:
Personal Data collected for purposes related to the performance of a contract between the Owner and the User shall be retained until such contract has been fully performed.
Personal Data collected for the purposes of the Owner’s legitimate interests shall be retained as long as needed to fulfill such purposes. Users may find specific information regarding the legitimate interests pursued by the Owner within the relevant sections of  this document or by contacting the Owner.
The Owner may be allowed to retain Personal Data for a longer period whenever the User has given consent to such processing, as long as such consent is not withdrawn. Furthermore, the Owner may be obliged to retain Personal Data for a longer period whenever required to fulfil a legal obligation or upon order of an authority.
Once the retention period expires, Personal Data shall be deleted. Therefore, the right of access, the right to erasure, the right to rectification and the right to data portability cannot be enforced after expiration of the retention period.
The rights of Users based on the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
Users may exercise certain rights regarding their Data processed by the Owner.
In particular, Users have the right to do the following, to the extent permitted by law:
Withdraw their consent at any time.
Users have the right to withdraw consent where they have previously given their consent to the processing of their Personal Data.
Object to processing of their Data.
Users have the right to object to the processing of their Data if the processing is carried out on a legal basis other than consent.
Access their Data.
Users have the right to learn if Data is being processed by the Owner, obtain disclosure regarding certain aspects of the processing and obtain a copy of the Data undergoing processing.
Verify and seek rectification.
Users have the right to verify the accuracy of their Data and ask for it to be updated or corrected.
Restrict the processing of their Data.
Users have the right to restrict the processing of their Data. In this case, the Owner will not process their Data for any purpose other than storing it.
Have their Personal Data deleted or otherwise removed.
Users have the right to obtain the erasure of their Data from the Owner.
Receive their Data and have it transferred to another controller.
Users have the right to receive their Data in a structured, commonly used and machine readable format and, if technically feasible, to have it transmitted to another controller without any hindrance.
Lodge a complaint.
Users have the right to bring a claim before their competent data protection authority.
Users are also entitled to learn about the legal basis for Data transfers abroad including to any international organization governed by public international law or set up by two or more countries, such as the UN, and about the security measures taken by the Owner to safeguard their Data.
Details about the right to object to processing
Where Personal Data is processed for a public interest, in the exercise of an official authority vested in the Owner or for the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by the Owner, Users may object to such processing by providing a ground related to their particular situation to justify the objection.
Users must know that, however, should their Personal Data be processed for direct marketing purposes, they can object to that processing at any time, free of charge and without providing any justification. Where the User objects to processing for direct marketing purposes, the Personal Data will no longer be processed for such purposes. To learn whether the Owner is processing Personal Data for direct marketing purposes, Users may refer to the relevant sections of this document.
How to exercise these rights
Any requests to exercise User rights can be directed to the Owner through  the contact details provided in this document. Such requests are free of charge and will be answered by the Owner as early as possible and always within one month, providing Users with the information required by law. Any rectification or erasure of Personal Data or restriction of processing will be communicated by the Owner to each recipient, if any, to whom the Personal Data has been disclosed unless this proves impossible or involves disproportionate effort. At the Users’ request, the Owner will inform them about those recipients.
Transfer of Personal Data outside of the European Union
Data transfer to countries that guarantee European standards
If this is the legal basis, the transfer of Personal Data from the EU to third countries is carried out according to an adequacy decision of the European Commission.
The European Commission adopts adequacy decisions for specific countries whenever it considers that country to possess and provide Personal Data protection standards comparable to those set forth by EU data protection legislation. Users can find an updated list of all adequacy decisions issued on the European Commission's website.
Additional information about Data collection and processing
Legal action
The User's Personal Data may be used for legal purposes by the Owner in Court or in the stages leading to possible legal action arising from improper use of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos or the related Services.
The User declares to be aware that the Owner may be required to reveal personal data upon request of public authorities.
Additional information about User's Personal Data
In addition to the information contained in this privacy policy, Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos may provide the User with additional and contextual information concerning particular Services or the collection and processing of Personal Data upon request.
System logs and maintenance
For operation and maintenance purposes, Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos and any third-party services may collect files that record interaction with Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos (System logs) or use other Personal Data (such as the IP Address) for this purpose.
Information not contained in this policy
More details concerning the collection or processing of Personal Data may be requested from the Owner at any time. Please see the contact information at the beginning of this document.
Changes to this privacy policy
The Owner reserves the right to make changes to this privacy policy at any time by notifying its Users on this page and possibly within Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos and/or - as far as technically and legally feasible - sending a notice to Users via any contact information available to the Owner. It is strongly recommended to check this page often, referring to the date of the last modification listed at the bottom.
Should the changes affect processing activities performed on the basis of the User’s consent, the Owner shall collect new consent from the User, where required.
Definitions and legal references
Personal Data (or Data)
Any information that directly, indirectly, or in connection with other information — including a personal identification number — allows for the identification or identifiability of a natural person.
Usage Data
Information collected automatically through Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos (or third-party services employed in Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos), which can include: the IP addresses or domain names of the computers utilized by the Users who use Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos, the URI addresses (Uniform Resource Identifier), the time of the request, the method utilized to submit the request to the server, the size of the file received in response, the numerical code indicating the status of the server's answer (successful outcome, error, etc.), the country of origin, the features of the browser and the operating system utilized by the User, the various time details per visit (e.g., the time spent on each page within the Application) and the details about the path followed within the Application with special reference to the sequence of pages visited, and other parameters about the device operating system and/or the User's IT environment.
User
The individual using Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos who, unless otherwise specified, coincides with the Data Subject.
Data Subject
The natural person to whom the Personal Data refers.
Data Processor (or Processor)
The natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which processes Personal Data on behalf of the Controller, as described in this privacy policy.
Data Controller (or Owner)
The natural or legal person, public authority, agency or other body which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of Personal Data, including the security measures concerning the operation and use of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos. The Data Controller, unless otherwise specified, is the Owner of Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos.
Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos (or this Application)
The means by which the Personal Data of the User is collected and processed.
Service
The service provided by Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos as described in the relative terms (if available) and on this site/application.
European Union (or EU)
Unless otherwise specified, all references made within this document to the European Union include all current member states to the European Union and the European Economic Area.
Cookie
Cookies are Trackers consisting of small sets of data stored in the User's browser.
Tracker
Tracker indicates any technology - e.g Cookies, unique identifiers, web beacons, embedded scripts, e-tags and fingerprinting - that enables the tracking of Users, for example by accessing or storing information on the User’s device.
Legal information
This privacy policy relates solely to Terremoto, Earthquake, Séisme, 地震, Seismos, if not stated otherwise within this document.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/en-ww/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Shop the Latest
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
Accessories
Find a Store
Order Status
Apple Trade In
Financing
Personal Setup
Certified Refurbished
Education
Business
Veterans and Military
Government
Mac
Explore All Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Displays
Compare Mac
Switch from PC to Mac
Shop Mac
Help Me Choose
Mac Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Mac Support
AppleCare+ for Mac
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
Continuity
iCloud+
Mac for Business
Education
iPad
Explore All iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Keyboards
Compare iPad
Why iPad
Shop iPad
iPad Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
iPad Support
AppleCare+ for iPad
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iCloud+
Education
iPhone
Explore All iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Compare iPhone
Switch from Android
Shop iPhone
iPhone Accessories
Apple Trade In
Carrier Deals at Apple
Financing
iPhone Support
AppleCare+ for iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iPhone Privacy
iCloud+
Wallet, Pay, Card
Siri
Watch
Explore All Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Apple Watch Hermès
Compare Watch
Why Apple Watch
Shop Apple Watch
Apple Watch Studio
Apple Watch Bands
Apple Watch Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Apple Watch Support
AppleCare+
watchOS 11
Apple Watch For Your Kids
Apps by Apple
Apple Fitness+
Vision
Explore Apple Vision Pro
Guided Tour
Tech Specs
Shop Apple Vision Pro
Apple Vision Pro Accessories
Book a Demo
Financing
Apple Vision Pro Support
AppleCare+
visionOS 2
AirPods
Explore All AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Compare AirPods
Shop AirPods
AirPods Accessories
AirPods Support
AppleCare+ for Headphones
Hearing Health
Apple Music
TV & Home
Explore TV & Home
Apple TV 4K
HomePod
HomePod mini
Shop Apple TV 4K
Shop HomePod
Shop HomePod mini
Shop Siri Remote
TV & Home Accessories
Apple TV Support
HomePod Support
AppleCare+
Apple TV app
Apple TV+
Home app
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entertainment
Explore Entertainment
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple News+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Apple TV+ Support
Apple Music Support
Accessories
Shop All Accessories
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
TV & Home
Made by Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Support
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Music
TV
Explore Support
Community
Check Coverage
Repair
Get AppleCare+
Apple Account and Password
Billing & Subscriptions
Accessibility
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Privacy
Local Nav Open Menu
Local Nav Close Menu
Overview
Features
Control
Labels
Transparency Report
Privacy Policy
English
Choose your preferred language
At Apple, we believe strongly in fundamental privacy rights — and that those fundamental rights should not differ depending on where you live in the world.
That’s why we treat any data that relates to an identified or identifiable individual or that is linked or linkable to them by Apple as “personal data,” no matter where the individual lives.
This means that data that directly identifies you — such as your name — is personal data, and also data that does not directly identify you, but that can reasonably be used to identify you — such as the serial number of your device — is personal data. Aggregated data is considered non‑personal data for the purposes of this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy covers how
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
(collectively, “Apple”) handles personal data whether you interact with us on our websites, through Apple apps (such as Apple Music or Wallet), or in person (including by phone or when visiting an Apple Store). Apple may also link to third parties on our services or make third-party apps available for download in our App Store. Apple’s Privacy Policy does not apply to how third parties define personal data or how they use it. We encourage you to read their privacy policies and know your privacy rights before interacting with them.
At Apple, we respect your ability to know, access, correct, transfer, restrict the processing of, and delete your personal data. We have provided these rights to our global customer base and if you choose to exercise these privacy rights, you have the right not to be treated in a discriminatory way nor to receive a lesser degree of service from Apple. Where you are requested to consent to the processing of your personal data by Apple, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
To exercise your privacy rights and choices, including where a third-party service provider is acting on Apple’s behalf, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
for Apple or
shazam.com/privacy
for Shazam.
To help protect the security of your personal data, you must sign in to your account and your identity will be verified. If you want to obtain a copy of personal data that is not currently available from
privacy.apple.com
, you can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the applicable regulator.
There may be situations where we cannot grant your request — for example, if you ask us to delete your transaction data and Apple is legally obligated to keep a record of that transaction to comply with law. We may also decline to grant a request where doing so would undermine our legitimate use of data for anti-fraud and security purposes, such as when you request deletion of an account that is being investigated for security concerns. Other reasons your privacy request may be denied are if it jeopardizes the privacy of others, is frivolous or vexatious, or would be extremely impractical or unreasonable.
If you live in California and you cannot access Apple’s Data and Privacy page,
you or your authorized agent can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or by calling 1-800-275-2273.
For more information on exercising your rights, visit
support.apple.com/102283
.
At Apple, we believe that you can have great products and great privacy. This means that we strive to
collect only the personal data that we need
. The personal data Apple collects depends on how you interact with Apple. Descriptions of how Apple handles personal data for certain individual services are available at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
When you create an Apple Account, apply for commercial credit, purchase and/or activate a product or device, download a software update, register for a class at an Apple Store, connect to our services, contact us (including by social media), participate in an online survey, or otherwise interact with Apple, we may collect a variety of information, including:
Account Information.
Your Apple Account and related account details, including email address, devices registered, account status, and age
Device Information.
Data from which your device could be identified, such as device serial number, or about your device, such as browser type
Contact Information
. Data such as name, email address, physical address, phone number, or other contact information
Payment Information. Data about your billing address and method of payment, such as bank details, credit, debit, or other payment card information
Transaction Information.
Data about purchases of Apple products and services or transactions facilitated by Apple, including purchases on Apple platforms
Fraud Prevention Information.
Data used to help identify and prevent fraud, including a device trust score
Usage Data.
Data about your activity on and use of our offerings, such as app launches within our services, including browsing history; search history; product interaction; crash data, performance and other diagnostic data; and other usage data
Location Information
. Precise location only to support services such as Find My or where you agree for region-specific services, and coarse location
Health Information.
Data relating to the health status of an individual, including data related to one’s physical or mental health or condition. Personal health data also includes data that can be used to make inferences about or detect the health status of an individual. If you participate in a study using an Apple Health Research Study app, the policy governing the privacy of your personal data is described in the
Apple Health Study Apps Privacy Policy
.
Fitness Information.
Details relating to your fitness and exercise information where you choose to share them
Financial Information.
Details including salary, income, and assets information where collected, and information related to Apple-branded financial offerings
Government ID Data.
In certain jurisdictions, we may ask for a government-issued ID in limited circumstances, including when setting up a wireless account and activating your device, for the purpose of extending commercial credit, managing reservations, or as required by law
Other Information You Provide to Us.
Details such as the content of your communications with Apple, including interactions with customer support and contacts through social media channels
You are not required to provide the personal data that we have requested. However, if you choose not to do so, in many cases we will not be able to provide you with our products or services or respond to requests you may have.
Apple may receive personal data about you from other
individuals
, from businesses or third parties acting
at your direction
, from our
partners
who work with us to provide our products and services and assist us in security and fraud prevention, and from other
lawful sources.
Individuals.
Apple may collect data about you from other individuals — for example, if that individual has sent you a product or gift card, invited you to participate in an Apple service or forum, or shared content with you.
At Your Direction.
You may direct other individuals or third parties to share data with Apple. For example, you may direct your mobile carrier to share data about your carrier account with Apple for account activation, or for your loyalty program to share information about your participation so that you can earn rewards for Apple purchases.
Apple Partners.
We may also validate the information you provide — for example, when creating an Apple Account, with a third party for security, and for fraud-prevention purposes.
To power features such as search and as a source for our foundational AI models, Apple uses Applebot, a web crawler, to crawl information that is publicly available on the internet. We have measures in place to reduce the amount of personal data we collect and make no attempt to connect data crawled to any individual Apple user, or to build profiles about individuals. Your private personal data is not used to train our foundational AI models. To exercise your right as an individual to opt out of processing, visit the
Apple Intelligence Privacy Inquiries form
. For more information about Applebot, visit
support.apple.com/120320
.
For research and development purposes, we may use datasets such as those that contain images, voices, or other data that could be associated with an identifiable person. When acquiring such datasets, we do so in accordance with applicable law, including law in the jurisdiction in which the dataset is hosted. When using such datasets for research and development, we do not attempt to reidentify individuals who may appear therein.
Apple uses personal data to power our services, to process your transactions, to communicate with you, for security and fraud prevention, and to comply with law. We may also use personal data for other purposes with your consent.
Apple uses your personal data only when we have a valid legal basis to do so.
Depending on the circumstance, Apple may rely on your consent or the fact that the processing is necessary to fulfill a contract with you, protect your vital interests or those of other persons, or to comply with law. We may also process your personal data where we believe it is in our or others’ legitimate interests, taking into consideration your interests, rights, and expectations. More information is available in the product-specific information embedded in our products and features as described above. If you have questions about the legal basis, you can contact the Data Protection Officer at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Power Our Services.
Apple collects personal data necessary to power our services, which may include personal data collected to improve our offerings, for internal purposes such as auditing or data analysis, or for troubleshooting. For example, if you would like to access a song through an Apple Music subscription, we collect data on what songs you play in order to provide you with the content requested and for royalty purposes.
Process Your Transactions.
To process transactions, Apple must collect data such as your name, purchase, and payment information.
Communicate with You.
To respond to communications, reach out to you about your transactions or account, market our products and services, provide other relevant information, or request information or feedback. From time to time, we may use your personal data to send important notices, such as communications about purchases and changes to our terms, conditions, and policies. Because this information is important to your interaction with Apple, you may not opt out of receiving these important notices.
Security and Fraud Prevention.
To protect individuals, employees, and Apple and for loss prevention and to prevent fraud, including to protect individuals, employees, and Apple for the benefit of all our users, and prescreening or scanning uploaded content for potentially illegal content, including child sexual exploitation material.
Personal Data Used for Personalization.
If you choose to personalize your services or communications where such options are available, Apple will use information that we collect so that we can offer you those personalized services or communications. You can learn more about how relevant services use information to personalize your experience by reviewing the privacy information presented when you first use a service that asks to use your personal data. We make this information easy to find by presenting it with our Data & Privacy icon; it’s also available at all times on your Apple device and online at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
Comply with Law.
To comply with applicable law — for example, to satisfy tax or reporting obligations, or to comply with a lawful governmental request.
Apple does not use algorithms or profiling to make any decision that would significantly affect you without the opportunity for human review. Apple also does not use or disclose sensitive personal data for any purposes that would require a user to exercise a right to limit processing according to California law.
Apple retains personal data only for so long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, including as described in this Privacy Policy or in our service-specific privacy notices, or as required by law. We will retain your personal data for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy and our service-specific privacy notices. When assessing retention periods, we first carefully examine whether it is necessary to retain the personal data collected and, if retention is required, work to retain the personal data for the shortest possible period permissible under law.
Apple may share personal data with
Apple-affiliated companies
,
service providers
who act on our behalf, our
partners
,
developers, and publishers
, or others
at your direction
. Further, Apple does not share personal data with third parties for their own marketing purposes.
Service Providers.
Apple may engage third parties to act as our service providers and perform certain tasks on our behalf, such as processing or storing data, including personal data, in connection with your use of our services and delivering products to customers. Apple service providers are obligated to handle personal data consistent with this Privacy Policy and according to our instructions. They cannot use the personal data we share for their own purposes and must delete or return the personal data once they’ve fulfilled our request.
Partners.
At times, Apple may partner with third parties to provide services or other offerings. For example, Apple financial offerings like Apple Card and Apple Cash are offered by Apple and our partners. Apple requires its partners to protect your personal data.
Developers and Publishers from Whom You Get a Subscription.
If you purchase a third-party subscription from the App Store or within Apple News, we create a Subscriber ID that is unique to you and the developer or publisher. The Subscriber ID may be used to provide reports to the developer or publisher, which include information about the subscription you purchased and your country of residence. If you cancel all of your subscriptions from a particular developer or publisher, the Subscriber ID will reset after 180 days if you do not resubscribe. This information is provided to developers or publishers so that they can understand the performance of their subscriptions.
Others.
Apple may share personal data with others at your direction or with your consent, such as when we share information with your carrier to activate your account. We may also disclose information about you if we determine that for purposes of national security, law enforcement, or other issues of public importance, disclosure is necessary or appropriate. We may also disclose information about you where there is a lawful basis for doing so, if we determine that disclosure is reasonably necessary to enforce our terms and conditions or to protect our operations or users, or in the event of a reorganization, merger, or sale.
Apple does not sell your personal data including as “sale” is defined in Nevada and California. Apple also does not “share” your personal data as that term is defined in California.
At Apple, we believe that great privacy rests on great security. We use
administrative, technical, and physical safeguards
to protect your personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the processing, and the threats posed. We are constantly working to improve on these safeguards to help keep your personal data secure. For more information, visit our
Apple Platform Security
guide.
Apple understands the importance of safeguarding the personal data of children, which we consider to be an
individual under the age of 13 or the equivalent age as specified by law in your jurisdiction
. That is why Apple has implemented additional processes and protections to help keep children’s personal data safe.
To access certain Apple services, a child must have a child Apple Account. A child Apple Account may be created by the
parent
or, in the case of a Managed Apple Account, by the
child’s educational institution
.
Parents.
To create a child account, parents must review the
Family Privacy Disclosure for Children
, which describes how Apple handles children’s personal data. If they agree, the parent must provide Apple with a verifiable parental consent.
Educational Institutions.
Educational institutions that participate in the Apple School Manager Program may also create Apple IDs for students, called “Managed Apple IDs.” These schools are required to agree to the
Managed Apple IDs for Students Disclosure
which is included as Exhibit A to the Apple School Manager Agreement.
If we learn that a child’s personal data was collected without appropriate authorization, it will be deleted as soon as possible.
To exercise privacy rights for your child’s information, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
and sign in to their account.
Apple’s websites, online services, interactive applications, and advertisements may use
“cookies” and other technologies
such as web beacons.
These technologies help us to better understand user behavior including for security and fraud prevention purposes, tell us which parts of our websites people have visited, and facilitate and measure the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches.
Communications Cookies.
These cookies are used to enable network traffic to and from Apple’s systems, including by helping us detect any errors.
Strictly Necessary Cookies.
These cookies are set as required to provide a specific feature or service that you have accessed or requested. For example, they allow us to display our websites in the proper format and language, to authenticate and verify your transactions, and to preserve the contents of your Bag when shopping online at
apple.com
.
Other Cookies.
These cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with our websites and online services, including by helping us to assess the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches. Apple also uses these cookies to remember choices you make while browsing, so we can provide you with a customized experience.
If you prefer that Apple not use cookies, we provide you with the means to disable their use. If you want to disable cookies and you’re using the Safari web browser, choose “Block all cookies” in Safari’s privacy settings. If you are using a different browser, check with your provider to find out how to disable cookies. Certain features of the Apple website may not be available if all cookies are disabled.
In addition to cookies, Apple uses other technologies that help us achieve similar objectives.
In some email messages Apple sends to you, we provide a “click-through URL” that links you to content on the Apple website. When you click one of these URLs, they pass through a separate server before arriving at the destination page on our website. We track this click-through to help us determine interest in particular topics and measure whether we are communicating with you effectively. If you prefer not to be tracked in this way, you should not click graphic or text links in email messages.
Apple generally treats data we collect using these cookies and similar technologies as non-personal data.
However, to the extent that Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or similar identifiers are considered personal data by local law, we also treat these identifiers as personal data in those regions. In addition, Apple sometimes combines non-personal data collected from these technologies with other personal data Apple holds. When we combine data in this way, we treat the combined data as personal data for purposes of this Privacy Policy.
Ads that are delivered by Apple’s advertising platform may appear on the App Store, Apple News, Stocks, and Apple TV app depending on your location. Apple’s advertising platform does not track you, meaning that it does not link user or device data collected from our apps with user or device data collected from third parties for targeted advertising or advertising measurement purposes, and does not share user or device data with data brokers.
If you do not want to receive ads targeted to your interests from Apple's advertising platform in those apps, you can choose to disable Personalized Ads, which will opt your Apple Account out of receiving such ads regardless of what device you are using. On your iOS, iPadOS, or visionOS device, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to Settings > Privacy & Security > Apple Advertising and tapping to turn off Personalized Ads. On your Mac, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to System Settings > Privacy & Security > Privacy > Advertising, then deselecting Personalized Ads. You may still see ads in the App Store, Apple News, or Stocks based on context like your search query or the channel you are reading. If you disable Allow Apps to Request to Track, third-party apps cannot request to use the Advertising Identifier, a non-personal identifier served by the operating system on your device, to track you across apps and websites owned by other companies.
For more information about Apple-delivered advertising and privacy, visit
apple.com/legal/privacy/data/ww/apple-advertising
.
Apple products and offerings connect you to the world. To make that possible,
your personal data may be transferred to or accessed by entities around the world,
including Apple-affiliated companies, to perform processing activities such as those described in this Privacy Policy in connection with your use of our products and services. Apple complies with laws on the transfer of personal data between countries to help ensure your data is protected, wherever it may be.
The Apple entity that controls your personal data may differ depending on where you live.
For example, Apple Store information is controlled by individual retail entities in each country and Apple Media Services-related personal data may be controlled by various Apple entities as reflected in the terms of service. If you do not reside in the U.S., your personal data may be processed by Apple Inc. and other Apple-affiliated companies on behalf of the Apple entity controlling personal data for your jurisdiction. For example, Imagery and associated data collected by Apple around the world to improve Apple Maps and to support our Look Around feature is transferred to Apple Inc. in California.
Personal data relating to individuals in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is controlled by Apple Distribution International Limited in Ireland. Apple’s international transfer of personal data collected in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is governed by
Standard Contractual Clauses
. If you have questions or would like a copy of Apple’s Standard Contractual Clauses, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Personal data collected by
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
worldwide is generally stored by Apple Inc. in the United States. Regardless of where your personal data is stored, Apple maintains the same high level of protection and safeguarding measures.
Apple’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Global Cross-Border Privacy Rules (CBPRs) System and the Global Privacy Recognition for Processors (PRP) System. For more information about the Global CBPR and PRP Systems, visit
Global CBPR Forum
. To view our certifications, visit
CBPR System Compliance Directory
. For more information about the scope of our participation, or to submit a privacy inquiry through
BBB National Programs
, our Accountability Agent, visit:
Cross-Border Privacy Rules Program
Privacy Recognition for Processors Program
Personal data relating to individuals in the People’s Republic of China may be processed by Apple in countries outside of the People’s Republic of China, such as Apple Inc. in the United States or Apple Distribution International Limited in the Republic of Ireland. Where this occurs, it will be done in compliance with local laws, including the Personal Information Protection Law. For the purposes of processing set out in this Privacy Policy, Apple may also transfer such personal data to third-party service providers, who may in turn store or transfer the data outside of the People’s Republic of China. For more information, visit
China Mainland Privacy Disclosures
.
To make sure your personal data is secure, we communicate our privacy and security guidelines to Apple employees and strictly enforce privacy safeguards within the company.
If you have questions about Apple’s Privacy Policy or privacy practices including where a third-party service provider is acting on our behalf, or you would like to contact our Data Protection Officer, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or call the
Apple Support number
for your country or region.
You can also ask us questions about how to submit a privacy complaint and we will endeavor to help.
Apple takes your privacy questions seriously. A dedicated team reviews your inquiry to determine how best to respond to your question or concern, including those inquiries received in response to an access or download request. In most cases, all substantive contacts receive a response within seven days. In other cases, we may require additional information or let you know that we need more time to respond.
Where your complaint indicates an improvement could be made in our handling of privacy issues, we will take steps to make such an update at the next reasonable opportunity. In the event that a privacy issue has resulted in a negative impact on you or another person, we will take steps to address that with you or that other person.
You may at any time — including if you are not satisfied with Apple’s response — refer your complaint to the applicable regulator. If you ask us, we will endeavor to provide you with information about relevant complaint avenues which may be applicable to your circumstances.
When there is a material change to this Privacy Policy, we’ll post a notice on this website at least a week in advance of doing so and contact you directly about the change if we have your data on file.
View our CBPR certification
View our PRP certification
Sub-policy 2
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Shop the Latest
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
Accessories
Find a Store
Order Status
Apple Trade In
Financing
Personal Setup
Certified Refurbished
Education
Business
Veterans and Military
Government
Mac
Explore All Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Displays
Compare Mac
Switch from PC to Mac
Shop Mac
Help Me Choose
Mac Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Mac Support
AppleCare+ for Mac
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
Continuity
iCloud+
Mac for Business
Education
iPad
Explore All iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Keyboards
Compare iPad
Why iPad
Shop iPad
iPad Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
iPad Support
AppleCare+ for iPad
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iCloud+
Education
iPhone
Explore All iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Compare iPhone
Switch from Android
Shop iPhone
iPhone Accessories
Apple Trade In
Carrier Deals at Apple
Financing
iPhone Support
AppleCare+ for iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iPhone Privacy
iCloud+
Wallet, Pay, Card
Siri
Watch
Explore All Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Apple Watch Hermès
Compare Watch
Why Apple Watch
Shop Apple Watch
Apple Watch Studio
Apple Watch Bands
Apple Watch Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Apple Watch Support
AppleCare+
watchOS 11
Apple Watch For Your Kids
Apps by Apple
Apple Fitness+
Vision
Explore Apple Vision Pro
Guided Tour
Tech Specs
Shop Apple Vision Pro
Apple Vision Pro Accessories
Book a Demo
Financing
Apple Vision Pro Support
AppleCare+
visionOS 2
AirPods
Explore All AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Compare AirPods
Shop AirPods
AirPods Accessories
AirPods Support
AppleCare+ for Headphones
Hearing Health
Apple Music
TV & Home
Explore TV & Home
Apple TV 4K
HomePod
HomePod mini
Shop Apple TV 4K
Shop HomePod
Shop HomePod mini
Shop Siri Remote
TV & Home Accessories
Apple TV Support
HomePod Support
AppleCare+
Apple TV app
Apple TV+
Home app
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entertainment
Explore Entertainment
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple News+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Apple TV+ Support
Apple Music Support
Accessories
Shop All Accessories
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
TV & Home
Made by Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Support
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Music
TV
Explore Support
Community
Check Coverage
Repair
Get AppleCare+
Apple Account and Password
Billing & Subscriptions
Accessibility
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Legal
Open Menu
Close Menu
Hardware
Software
Sales & Support
Internet Services
Intellectual Property
More Resources
JavaScript is required to view this content.
Something went wrong.
The content for this page did not load correctly. Reload the page to try again.
Reload Page
Choose a Topic
Privacy Policy
Apple ID and Family Sharing Disclosure
Privacy Governance
Government Information Requests
Manage Your Account
Sub-policy 3
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 4
https://business.safety.google/privacy/:
business.safety.google uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Learn more about
how Google processes personal information
Google's use of information
Helps you understand how Google uses personal information it receives from sites or apps that use our advertising services.
Read more
Privacy Policy
Helps you understand what information Google collects and why, how we use it, and how you can review, manage, delete and update it.
Read more
Data use across Google services
Helps you understand how personal data is shared across Google services and how Google handles personal data received from our advertising partners.
Read more
Sub-policy 5
https://cloud.google.com/terms/data-processing-addendum/:
cloud.google.com uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Back to Google Cloud Terms Directory
Current
Cloud Data Processing Addendum (Customers)
This Cloud Data Processing Addendum (including its appendices, the “
Addendum
”) is incorporated into the Agreement(s) (as defined below) between Google and Customer. This Addendum was formerly known as the “Data Processing and Security Terms” under an Agreement for Google Cloud Platform, Looker (original), Google SecOps Services, or Google Cloud Skills Boost for Organizations; the “Data Processing Amendment” under an Agreement for Google Workspace or Cloud Identity; and the “Data Processing Addendum” under an Agreement for Mandiant Consulting Services and Managed Services.
Expand all
General Terms
1. Overview
This Addendum describes the parties’ obligations, including under applicable privacy, data security, and data protection laws, with respect to the processing and security of Customer Data (as defined below). This Addendum will be effective on the Addendum Effective Date (as defined below), and will replace any terms previously applicable to the processing and security of Customer Data. Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Addendum have the meaning given to them in the Agreement.
2. Definitions
2.1 In this Addendum:
“
Addendum Effective Date
” means the date on which Customer accepted, or the parties otherwise agreed to, this Addendum.
“
Additional Security Controls
”
means security resources, features, functionality, and controls that Customer may use at its option and as it determines, including the Admin Console, encryption, logging and monitoring, identity and access management, security scanning, and firewalls.
“
Agreement
” means the contract under which Google has agreed to provide the applicable Services to Customer.
“
Applicable Privacy Law
” means, as applicable to the processing of Customer Personal Data, any national, federal, European Union, state, provincial or other privacy, data security, or data protection law or regulation.
“
Audited Services
”
means the then-current Services indicated as being in-scope for the relevant certification or report at
https://cloud.google.com/security/compliance/services-in-scope
. Google may not remove any Services from this URL unless they have been discontinued in accordance with the applicable Agreement.
“
Compliance Certifications
” has the meaning given in Section 7.4 (Compliance Certifications and SOC Reports).
“
Customer Data
”, if not defined in the Agreement, has the meaning given in Appendix 4 (Specific Products).
“
Customer Personal Data
” means the personal data contained within the Customer Data, including any special categories of personal data or sensitive data defined under Applicable Privacy Law.
“
Data Incident
” means a breach of Google’s security leading to the accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, Customer Data on systems managed by or otherwise controlled by Google.
“
EMEA
”
means Europe, the Middle East and Africa.
“
EU GDPR
” means Regulation (EU) 2016/679 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 27 April 2016 on the protection of natural persons with regard to the processing of personal data and on the free movement of such data, and repealing Directive 95/46/EC.
“
European Data Protection Law
” means, as applicable: (a) the GDPR; or (b) the Swiss FADP.
“
European Law
” means, as applicable: (a) EU or EU Member State law (if the EU GDPR applies to the processing of Customer Personal Data); (b) the law of the UK or a part of the UK (if the UK GDPR applies to the processing of Customer Personal Data); or (c) the law of Switzerland (if the Swiss FADP applies to the processing of Customer Personal Data).
“
GDPR
” means, as applicable: (a) the EU GDPR; or (b) the UK GDPR.
“
Google’s Third-Party Auditor
” means a Google-appointed, qualified and independent third-party auditor, whose then-current identity Google will disclose to Customer.
“
Instructions
” has the meaning given in Section 5.2 (Compliance with Customer’s Instructions).
“
Notification Email Address
” means the email address(es) designated by Customer in the Admin Console or Order Form to receive certain notifications from Google.
“
Security Documentation
” means the Compliance Certifications and the SOC Reports.
“
Security Measures
” has the meaning given in Section 7.1.1 (Google’s Security Measures).
“
Services
” means the applicable services described in Appendix 4 (Specific Products).
“
SOC Reports
” has the meaning given in Section 7.4 (Compliance Certifications and SOC Reports).
“
Subprocessor
” means a third party authorized as another processor under this Addendum to process Customer Data in order to provide parts of the Services and TSS (if applicable).
“
Supervisory Authority
” means, as applicable: (a) a “supervisory authority” as defined in the EU GDPR; or (b) the “Commissioner” as defined in the UK GDPR or the Swiss FADP.
“
Swiss FADP
” means, as applicable, the Federal Act on Data Protection of 19 June 1992 (Switzerland) (with the Ordinance to the Federal Act on Data Protection of 14 June 1993) or the revised Federal Act on Data Protection of 25 September 2020 (Switzerland) (with the Ordinance to the Federal Act on Data Protection of 31 August 2022).
“
Term
” means the period from the Addendum Effective Date until the end of Google’s provision of the Services, including, if applicable, any period during which provision of the Services may be suspended and any post-termination period during which Google may continue providing the Services for transitional purposes.
“
UK GDPR
” means the EU GDPR as amended and incorporated into UK law under the UK European Union (Withdrawal) Act 2018, and applicable secondary legislation made under that Act.
2.2 The terms “personal data”, “data subject”, “processing”, “controller”, and “processor” as used in this Addendum have the meanings given by Applicable Privacy Law or, absent any such meaning or law, by the EU GDPR.
2.3 The terms “data subject”, “controller” and “processor” include “consumer”, “business”, and “service provider”, respectively, as required by Applicable Privacy Law.
3. Duration
Regardless of whether the applicable Agreement has terminated or expired, this Addendum will remain in effect until, and automatically expire when, Google deletes all Customer Data as described in this Addendum.
4. Roles; Legal Compliance
4.1
Roles of Parties.
Google is a processor and Customer is a controller or processor, as applicable, of Customer Personal Data.
4.2
Processing Summary.
The subject matter and details of the processing of Customer Personal Data are described in Appendix 1 (Subject Matter and Details of Data Processing).
4.3
Compliance with Law.
Each party will comply with its obligations related to the processing of Customer Personal Data under Applicable Privacy Law.
4.4
Additional Legal Terms
. To the extent the processing of Customer Personal Data is subject to an Applicable Privacy Law described in Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws), the corresponding terms in Appendix 3 will apply in addition to these General Terms and prevail as described in Section 14.1 (Precedence).
5. Data Processing
5.1
Processor Customers
. If Customer is a processor:
a. Customer warrants on an ongoing basis that the relevant controller has authorized:
i. the Instructions;
ii. Customer’s engagement of Google as another processor; and.
iii. Google’s engagement of Subprocessors as described in Section 11 (Subprocessors);
b. Customer will forward to the relevant controller promptly and without undue delay any notice provided by Google under Section 7.2.1 (Incident Notification), 9.2.1 (Responsibility for Requests), or 11.4 (Opportunity to Object to Subprocessors); and
c. Customer may make available to the relevant controller any other information made available by Google under this Addendum about the locations of Google data centers or the names, locations and activities of Subprocessors.
5.2
Compliance with Customer’s Instructions
. Customer instructs Google to process Customer Data in accordance with the applicable Agreement (including this Addendum) only as follows:
a. to provide, secure, and monitor the Services and TSS (if applicable); and
b. as further specified via:
i. Customer’s use of the Services (including via the Admin Console) and TSS (if applicable); and
ii. any other written instructions given by Customer and acknowledged by Google as constituting instructions under this Addendum
(collectively, the “
Instructions
”).
Google will comply with the Instructions unless prohibited by European Law, where European Data Protection Law applies, or prohibited by applicable law, where any other Applicable Privacy Law applies.
6. Data Deletion
6.1
Deletion by Customer
. Google will enable Customer to delete Customer Data during the Term in a manner consistent with the functionality of the Services. If Customer uses the Services to delete any Customer Data during the Term and that Customer Data cannot be recovered by Customer, this use will constitute an Instruction to Google to delete the relevant Customer Data from Google’s systems. Google will comply with this Instruction as soon as reasonably practicable and within a maximum period of 180 days, unless European Law requires storage, where European Data Protection Law applies, or applicable law requires storage, where any other Applicable Privacy Law applies.
6.2
Return or Deletion When Term Ends
. If Customer wishes to retain any Customer Data after the end of the Term, it may instruct Google in accordance with Section 9.1 (Access; Rectification; Restricted Processing; Portability) to return that data during the Term. Subject to Section 6.3 (Deferred Deletion Instruction), Customer instructs Google to delete all remaining Customer Data (including existing copies) from Google’s systems at the end of the Term. After a recovery period of up to 30 days from that date, Google will comply with this Instruction as soon as reasonably practicable and within a maximum period of 180 days, unless European Law requires storage, where European Data Protection Law applies, or applicable law requires storage, where any other Applicable Privacy Law applies.
6.3.
Deferred Deletion Instruction
. To the extent any Customer Data covered by the deletion instruction described in Section 6.2 (Return or Deletion When Term Ends) is also processed, when the applicable Term under Section 6.2 expires, in relation to an Agreement with a continuing Term, such deletion instruction will take effect with respect to such Customer Data only when the continuing Term expires. For clarity, this Addendum will continue to apply to such Customer Data until its deletion by Google.
7. Data Security
7.1
Google’s Security Measures, Controls and Assistance
.
7.1.1
Google’s Security Measures
. Google will implement and maintain technical, organizational, and physical measures to protect Customer Data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure or access as described in Appendix 2 (Security Measures)
(
the
“Security Measures”)
. The Security Measures include measures to encrypt Customer Data; to help ensure ongoing confidentiality, integrity, availability and resilience of Google’s systems and services; to help restore timely access to Customer Data following an incident; and for regular testing of effectiveness. Google may update the Security Measures from time to time provided that such updates do not result in a material reduction of the security of the Services.
7.1.2
Access and Compliance
. Google will:
a. authorize its employees, contractors and Subprocessors to access Customer Data only as strictly necessary to comply with Instructions;
b. take appropriate steps to ensure compliance with the Security Measures by its employees, contractors and Subprocessors to the extent applicable to their scope of performance; and
c. ensure that all persons authorized to process Customer Data are under an obligation of confidentiality.
7.1.3
Additional Security Controls
. Google will make Additional Security Controls available to:
a. allow Customer to take steps to secure Customer Data; and
b. provide Customer with information about securing, accessing and using Customer Data.
7.1.4
Google’s Security Assistance
. Google will (taking into account the nature of the processing of Customer Personal Data and the information available to Google) assist Customer in ensuring compliance with its (or, where Customer is a processor, the relevant controller’s) obligations relating to security and personal data breaches under Applicable Privacy Law, by:
a. implementing and maintaining the Security Measures in accordance with Section 7.1.1 (Google’s Security Measures);
b. making Additional Security Controls available in accordance with Section 7.1.3 (Additional Security Controls);
c. complying with the terms of Section 7.2 (Data Incidents);
d. making the Security Documentation available in accordance with Section 7.5.1 (Reviews of Security Documentation) and providing the information contained in the applicable Agreement (including this Addendum); and
e. if subsections (a)-(d) above are insufficient for Customer (or the relevant controller) to comply with such obligations, upon Customer’s request, providing Customer with additional reasonable cooperation and assistance.
7.2
Data Incidents
.
7.2.1
Incident Notification
. Google will notify Customer promptly and without undue delay after becoming aware of a Data Incident, and promptly take reasonable steps to minimize harm and secure Customer Data.
7.2.2
Details of Data Incident
. Google’s notification of a Data Incident will describe: the nature of the Data Incident including the Customer resources impacted; the measures Google has taken, or plans to take, to address the Data Incident and mitigate its potential risk; the measures, if any, Google recommends that Customer take to address the Data Incident; and details of a contact point where more information can be obtained. If it is not possible to provide all such information at the same time, Google’s initial notification will contain the information then available and further information will be provided without undue delay as it becomes available.
7.2.3
No Assessment of Customer Data by Google
. Google has no obligation to assess Customer Data in order to identify information subject to any specific legal requirements.
7.2.4
No Acknowledgement of Fault by Google
. Google’s notification of or response to a Data Incident under this Section 7.2 (Data Incidents) will not be construed as an acknowledgement by Google of any fault or liability with respect to the Data Incident.
7.3
Customer’s Security Responsibilities and Assessment
.
7.3.1
Customer’s Security Responsibilities
. Without prejudice to Google’s obligations under Sections 7.1 (Google’s Security Measures, Controls and Assistance) and 7.2 (Data Incidents), and elsewhere in the applicable Agreement, Customer is responsible for its use of the Services and its storage of any copies of Customer Data outside Google’s or Google’s Subprocessors’ systems, including:
a. using the Services and Additional Security Controls to ensure a level of security appropriate to the risk to the Customer Data;
b. securing the account authentication credentials, systems and devices Customer uses to access the Services; and
c. backing up or retaining copies of its Customer Data as appropriate.
7.3.2
Customer’s Security Assessment
. Customer agrees that the Services, Security Measures, Additional Security Controls, and Google’s commitments under this Section 7 (Data Security) provide a level of security appropriate to the risk to Customer Data (taking into account the state of the art, the costs of implementation and the nature, scope, context and purposes of the processing of Customer Data as well as the risks to individuals).
7.4
Compliance Certifications and SOC Reports
. Google will maintain at least the following for the Audited Services to verify the continued effectiveness of the Security Measures:
a. certificates for ISO 27001 and any additional certifications described in Appendix 4 (Specific Products) (the “
Compliance Certifications
”); and
b. SOC 2 and SOC 3 reports produced by Google’s Third-Party Auditor and updated annually based on an audit performed at least once every 12 months (the “
SOC Reports
”).
Google may add standards at any time. Google may replace a Compliance Certification or SOC Report with an equivalent or enhanced alternative.
7.5
Reviews and Audits of Compliance
.
7.5.1
Reviews of Security Documentation
. To demonstrate compliance by Google with its obligations under this Addendum, Google will make the Security Documentation available for review by Customer and, if Customer is a processor, allow Customer to request access to the SOC Reports for the relevant controller in accordance with Section 7.5.3 (Additional Business Terms for Reviews and Audits).
7.5.2
Customer’s Audit Rights
.
a.
Customer Audit
.
Google will, if required under Applicable Privacy Law, allow Customer or an independent auditor appointed by Customer to conduct audits (including inspections) to verify Google’s compliance with its obligations under this Addendum in accordance with Section 7.5.3 (Additional Business Terms for Reviews and Audits). During an audit, Google will reasonably cooperate with Customer or its auditor as described in this Section 7.5 (Reviews and Audits of Compliance).
b.
Customer Independent Review
. Customer may conduct an audit to verify Google’s compliance with its obligations under this Addendum by reviewing the Security Documentation (which reflects the outcome of audits conducted by Google’s Third-Party Auditor).
7.5.3
Additional Business Terms for Reviews and Audits
.
a. Customer must contact Google’s Cloud Data Protection Team to request:
i. access to the SOC Reports for a relevant controller under Section 7.5.1 (Reviews of Security Documentation); or
ii. an audit under Section 7.5.2(a) (Customer Audit).
b. Following a Customer request under Section 7.5.3(a), Google and Customer will discuss and agree in advance on:
i. security and confidentiality controls applicable to any access to the SOC Reports by a relevant controller under Section 7.5.1 (Reviews of Security Documentation); and
ii. the reasonable start date, scope and duration of and security and confidentiality controls applicable to any audit under Section 7.5.2(a) (Customer Audit).
c. Google may charge a fee (based on Google’s reasonable costs) for any audit under Section 7.5.2(a) (Customer Audit). Google will provide Customer with further details of any applicable fee, and the basis of its calculation, in advance of any such audit. Customer will be responsible for any fees charged by any auditor appointed by Customer to execute any such audit.
d. Google may object in writing to an auditor appointed by Customer to conduct any audit under Section 7.5.2(a) (Customer Audit) if the auditor is, in Google’s reasonable opinion, not suitably qualified or independent, a competitor of Google, or otherwise manifestly unsuitable. Any such objection by Google will require Customer to appoint another auditor or conduct the audit itself.
e. Any Customer requests under Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws) or Appendix 4 (Specific Products) for access to any SOC reports for a relevant controller or for audits will also be subject to this Section 7.5.3 (Additional Business Terms for Reviews and Audits).
8. Impact Assessments and Consultations
Google will (taking into account the nature of the processing and the information available to Google) assist Customer in ensuring compliance with its (or, where Customer is a processor, the relevant controller’s) obligations relating to data protection assessments, risk assessments, prior regulatory consultations or equivalent procedures under Applicable Privacy Law, by:
a. making Additional Security Controls available in accordance with Section 7.1.3 (Additional Security Controls) and the Security Documentation available in accordance with Section 7.5.1 (Reviews of Security Documentation);
b. providing the information contained in the applicable Agreement (including this Addendum); and
c. if subsections (a) and (b) above are insufficient for Customer (or the relevant controller) to comply with such obligations, upon Customer’s request, providing Customer with additional reasonable cooperation and assistance.
9. Access; Data Subject Rights; Data Export
9.1
Access; Rectification; Restricted Processing; Portability
. During the Term, Google will enable Customer, in a manner consistent with the functionality of the Services, to access, rectify and restrict processing of Customer Data, including via the deletion functionality provided by Google as described in Section 6.1 (Deletion by Customer), and to export Customer Data. If Customer becomes aware that any Customer Personal Data is inaccurate or outdated, Customer will be responsible for using such functionality to rectify or delete that data if required by Applicable Privacy Law.
9.2
Data Subject Requests
.
9.2.1
Responsibility for Requests
. During the Term, if Google’s Cloud Data Protection Team receives a request from a data subject that relates to Customer Personal Data and identifies Customer, Google will:
a. advise the data subject to submit their request to Customer;
b. promptly notify Customer; and
c. not otherwise respond to that data subject’s request without authorization from Customer.
Customer will be responsible for responding to any such request including, where necessary, by using the functionality of the Services.
9.2.2
Google’s Data Subject Request Assistance
. Google will (taking into account the nature of the processing of Customer Personal Data) assist Customer in fulfilling its (or, where Customer is a processor, the relevant controller’s) obligations under Applicable Privacy Law to respond to requests for exercising the data subject’s rights by:
a. making Additional Security Controls available in accordance with Section 7.1.3 (Additional Security Controls);
b. complying with Sections 9.1 (Access; Rectification; Restricted Processing; Portability) and 9.2.1 (Responsibility for Requests); and
c. if subsections (a) and (b) above are insufficient for Customer (or the relevant controller) to comply with such obligations, upon Customer’s request, providing Customer with additional reasonable cooperation and assistance.
10. Data Processing Locations
10.1
Data Storage and Processing Facilities.
Subject to Google’s data location commitments under the Service Specific Terms and data transfer commitments under Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws), if applicable, Customer Data may be processed in any country where Google or its Subprocessors maintain facilities.
10.2
Data Center Information
. The locations of Google data centers are described in Appendix 4 (Specific Products).
11. Subprocessors
11.1
Consent to Subprocessor Engagement
. Customer specifically authorizes Google’s engagement as Subprocessors of those entities disclosed as described in Section 11.2 (Information about Subprocessors) as of the Addendum Effective Date. In addition, without prejudice to Section 11.4 (Opportunity to Object to Subprocessors), Customer generally authorizes Google’s engagement of other third parties as Subprocessors (“
New Subprocessors
”).
11.2
Information about Subprocessors
. Names, locations, and activities of Subprocessors are described in Appendix 4 (Specific Products).
11.3
Requirements for Subprocessor Engagement
. When engaging any Subprocessor, Google will:
a. ensure via a written contract that:
i. the Subprocessor only accesses and uses Customer Data to the extent required to perform the obligations subcontracted to it, and does so in accordance with the applicable Agreement (including this Addendum); and
ii. if required under Applicable Privacy Laws, the data protection obligations described in this Addendum are imposed on the Subprocessor (as may be further described in Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws)); and
b. remain fully liable for all obligations subcontracted to, and all acts and omissions of, the Subprocessor.
11.4
Opportunity to Object to Subprocessors
.
a. When Google engages any New Subprocessor during the Term, Google will, at least 30 days before the New Subprocessor starts processing any Customer Data, notify Customer of the engagement (including the name, location and activities of the New Subprocessor).
b. Customer may, within 90 days after being notified of the engagement of a New Subprocessor, object by immediately terminating the applicable Agreement for convenience:
i. in accordance with that Agreement's termination for convenience provision; or
ii. if there is no such provision, by notifying Google.
12. Cloud Data Protection Team; Processing Records
12.1
Cloud Data Protection Team
. Google’s Cloud Data Protection Team will provide prompt and reasonable assistance with any Customer queries related to processing of Customer Data under the applicable Agreement and can be contacted as described in the Notices section of the applicable Agreement or in Appendix 4 (Specific Products).
12.2
Google’s Processing Records
. Google will keep appropriate documentation of its processing activities as required by Applicable Privacy Law. To the extent any Applicable Privacy Law requires Google to collect and maintain records of certain information relating to Customer, Customer will use the Admin Console or other means identified in Appendix 4 (Specific Products) to supply such information and keep it accurate and up-to-date. Google may make any such information available to competent regulators, including a Supervisory Authority, if required by Applicable Privacy Law.
12.3
Controller Requests
. During the Term, if Google’s Cloud Data Protection Team receives a request or instruction from a third party purporting to be a controller of Customer Personal Data, Google will advise the third party to contact Customer.
13. Notices
Notices under this Addendum (including notifications of any Data Incidents) will be delivered to the Notification Email Address. Customer is responsible for using the Admin Console, or otherwise notifying Google,  to ensure that its Notification Email Address remains current and valid.
14. Interpretation
14.1
Precedence
. To the extent of any conflict between:
a. Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws) and the remainder of the Addendum (including Appendix 4 (Specific Products)), Appendix 3 will prevail; and
b. Appendix 4 (Specific Products) and the remainder of the Addendum (excluding Appendix 3), Appendix 4 will prevail; and
c. this Addendum and the remainder of the Agreement, this Addendum will prevail.
For clarity, if Customer has more than one Agreement, this Addendum will amend each of the Agreements separately.
14.2
Section References
. Unless indicated otherwise, section references in any Appendix to this Addendum refer to sections of the General Terms of the Addendum.
Appendix 1: Subject Matter and Details of Data Processing
Subject Matter
Google’s provision of the Services and TSS (if applicable) to Customer.
Duration of the Processing
The Term plus the period from the end of the Term until deletion of all Customer Data by Google in accordance with this Addendum.
Nature and Purpose of the Processing
Google will process Customer Personal Data for the purposes of providing the Services and TSS (if applicable) to Customer in accordance with this Addendum.
Categories of Data
Data relating to individuals provided to Google via the Services, by (or at the direction of) Customer or by its End Users.
Data Subjects
Data subjects include the individuals about whom data is provided to Google via the Services by (or at the direction of) Customer or by its End Users.
Appendix 2: Security Measures
As from the Addendum Effective Date, Google will implement and maintain the Security Measures described in this Appendix 2.
1. Data Center and Network Security
(a) Data Centers.
Infrastructure
. Google maintains geographically distributed data centers. Google stores all production data in physically secure data centers.
Redundancy
. Infrastructure systems have been designed to eliminate single points of failure and minimize the impact of anticipated environmental risks. Dual circuits, switches, networks or other necessary devices help provide this redundancy. The Services are designed to allow Google to perform certain types of preventative and corrective maintenance without interruption. All environmental equipment and facilities have documented preventative maintenance procedures that detail the process for and frequency of performance in accordance with the manufacturer’s or internal specifications. Preventative and corrective maintenance of the data center equipment is scheduled through a standard change process according to documented procedures.
Power
. The data center electrical power systems are designed to be redundant and maintainable without impact to continuous operations, 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. In most cases, a primary as well as an alternate power source, each with equal capacity, is provided for critical infrastructure components in the data center. Backup power is provided by various mechanisms such as uninterruptible power supplies (UPS) batteries, which supply consistently reliable power protection during utility brownouts, blackouts, over voltage, under voltage, and out-of-tolerance frequency conditions. If utility power is interrupted, backup power is designed to provide transitory power to the data center, at full capacity, for up to 10 minutes until the backup generator systems take over. The backup generators are capable of automatically starting up within seconds to provide enough emergency electrical power to run the data center at full capacity typically for a period of days.
Server Operating Systems
. Google servers use a Linux based implementation customized for the application environment. Data is stored using proprietary algorithms to augment data security and redundancy.
Code Quality
. Google employs a code review process to increase the security of the code used to provide the Services and enhance the security products in production environments.
Businesses Continuity
. Google has designed and regularly plans and tests its business continuity planning/disaster recovery programs.
(
b) Networks and Transmission.
Data Transmission
. Data centers are typically connected via high-speed private links to provide secure and fast data transfer between data centers. This is designed to prevent data from being read, copied, altered or removed without authorization during electronic transfer or transport or while being recorded onto data storage media. Google transfers data via Internet standard protocols.
External Attack Surface
. Google employs multiple layers of network devices and intrusion detection to protect its external attack surface. Google considers potential attack vectors and incorporates appropriate purpose built technologies into external facing systems.
Intrusion Detection
. Intrusion detection is intended to provide insight into ongoing attack activities and provide adequate information to respond to incidents. Google’s intrusion detection involves: (i) tightly controlling the size and make-up of Google’s attack surface through preventative measures; (ii) employing intelligent detection controls at data entry points; and (iii) employing technologies that automatically remedy certain dangerous situations.
Incident Response
. Google monitors a variety of communication channels for security incidents, and Google’s security personnel will react promptly to known incidents.
Encryption Technologies
. Google makes HTTPS encryption (also referred to as SSL or TLS connection) available. Google servers support ephemeral elliptic curve Diffie-Hellman cryptographic key exchange signed with RSA and ECDSA. These perfect forward secrecy (PFS) methods help protect traffic and minimize the impact of a compromised key, or a cryptographic breakthrough.
2. Access and Site Controls
(a) Site Controls.
On-site Data Center Security Operation
. Google’s data centers maintain an on-site security operation responsible for all physical data center security functions 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. The on-site security operation personnel monitor closed circuit TV (CCTV) cameras and all alarm systems. On-site security operation personnel perform internal and external patrols of the data center regularly.
Data Center Access Procedures
. Google maintains formal access procedures for allowing physical access to the data centers. The data centers are housed in facilities that require electronic card key access, with alarms that are linked to the on-site security operation. All entrants to the data center are required to identify themselves as well as show proof of identity to on-site security operations. Only authorized employees, contractors and visitors are allowed entry to the data centers. Only authorized employees and contractors are permitted to request electronic card key access to these facilities. Data center electronic card key access requests must be made through e-mail, and require the approval of the requestor’s manager and the data center director. All other entrants requiring temporary data center access must: (i) obtain approval in advance from the data center managers for the specific data center and internal areas they wish to visit; (ii) sign in at on-site security operations; and (iii) reference an approved data center access record identifying the individual as approved.
On-site Data Center Security Devices
. Google’s data centers employ a dual authentication access control system that is linked to a system alarm. The access control system monitors and records each individual’s electronic card key and when they access perimeter doors, shipping and receiving, and other critical areas. Unauthorized activity and failed access attempts are logged by the access control system and investigated, as appropriate. Authorized access throughout the business operations and data centers is restricted based on zones and the individual’s job responsibilities. The fire doors at the data centers are alarmed. CCTV cameras are in operation both inside and outside the data centers. The positioning of the cameras has been designed to cover strategic areas including, among others, the perimeter, doors to the data center building, and shipping/receiving. On-site security operations personnel manage the CCTV monitoring, recording and control equipment. Secure cables throughout the data centers connect the CCTV equipment. Cameras record on site via digital video recorders 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. The surveillance records are retained for up to 30 days based on activity.
(b) Access Control.
Infrastructure Security Personnel
. Google has, and maintains, a security policy for its personnel, and requires security training as part of the training package for its personnel. Google’s infrastructure security personnel are responsible for the ongoing monitoring of Google’s security infrastructure, the review of the Services, and responding to security incidents.
Access Control and Privilege Management
. Customer’s Administrators and End Users must authenticate themselves via a central authentication system or via a single sign on system in order to use the Services.
Internal Data Access Processes and Policies – Access Policy
. Google’s internal data access processes and policies are designed to prevent unauthorized persons and systems from gaining access to systems used to process Customer Data. Google designs its systems to (i) only allow authorized persons to access data they are authorized to access; and (ii) ensure that Customer Data cannot be read, copied, altered or removed without authorization during processing, use and after recording. The systems are designed to detect any inappropriate access. Google employs a centralized access management system to control personnel access to production servers, and only provides access to a limited number of authorized personnel. Google’s authentication and authorization systems utilize SSH certificates and security keys, and are designed to provide Google with secure and flexible access mechanisms. These mechanisms are designed to grant only approved access rights to site hosts, logs, data and configuration information. Google requires the use of unique user IDs, strong passwords, two factor authentication and carefully monitored access lists to minimize the potential for unauthorized account use. The granting or modification of access rights is based on: the authorized personnel’s job responsibilities; job duty requirements necessary to perform authorized tasks; and a need to know basis. The granting or modification of access rights must also be in accordance with Google’s internal data access policies and training. Approvals are managed by workflow tools that maintain audit records of all changes. Access to systems is logged to create an audit trail for accountability. Where passwords are employed for authentication (e.g. login to workstations), password policies that follow at least industry standard practices are implemented. These standards include restrictions on password reuse and sufficient password strength. For access to extremely sensitive information (e.g. credit card data), Google uses hardware tokens.
3. Data
(a)
Data Storage, Isolation and Logging
. Google stores data in a multi-tenant environment on Google-owned servers. Subject to any Instructions to the contrary (e.g. in the form of a data location selection), Google replicates Customer Data between multiple geographically dispersed data centers. Google also logically isolates Customer Data. Customer will be given control over specific data sharing policies. Those policies, in accordance with the functionality of the Services, will enable Customer to determine the product sharing settings applicable to its End Users for specific purposes. Customer may choose to use logging functionality that Google makes available via the Services.
(b)
Decommissioned Disks and Disk Erase Policy
. Disks containing data may experience performance issues, errors or hardware failure that lead them to be decommissioned (“Decommissioned Disk”). Every Decommissioned Disk is subject to a series of data destruction processes (the “Disk Erase Policy”) before leaving Google’s premises either for reuse or destruction. Decommissioned Disks are erased in a multi-step process and verified complete by at least two independent validators. The erase results are logged by the Decommissioned Disk’s serial number for tracking. Finally, the erased Decommissioned Disk is released to inventory for reuse and redeployment. If, due to hardware failure, the Decommissioned Disk cannot be erased, it is securely stored until it can be destroyed. Each facility is audited regularly to monitor compliance with the Disk Erase Policy.
4. Personnel Security
Google personnel are required to conduct themselves in a manner consistent with the company’s guidelines regarding confidentiality, business ethics, appropriate usage, and professional standards. Google conducts reasonably appropriate background checks to the extent legally permissible and in accordance with applicable local labor law and statutory regulations.
Google personnel are required to execute a confidentiality agreement and must acknowledge receipt of, and compliance with, Google’s confidentiality and privacy policies. Personnel are provided with security training. Personnel handling Customer Data are required to complete additional requirements appropriate to their role (e.g. certifications). Google’s personnel will not process Customer Data without authorization.
5. Subprocessor Security
Before onboarding Subprocessors, Google conducts an audit of the security and privacy practices of Subprocessors to ensure Subprocessors provide a level of security and privacy appropriate to their access to data and the scope of the services they are engaged to provide. Once Google has assessed the risks presented by the Subprocessor, then subject to the requirements described in Section 11.3 (Requirements for Subprocessor Engagement), the Subprocessor is required to enter into appropriate security, confidentiality and privacy contract terms.
Appendix 3: Specific Privacy Laws
The terms in each subsection of this Appendix 3 apply only where the corresponding law applies to the processing of Customer Personal Data.
European Data Protection Law
1. Additional Definitions.
“
Adequate Country
”
means:
(a) for data processed subject to the EU GDPR: the European Economic Area, or a country or territory recognized as ensuring adequate protection under the EU GDPR;
(b) for data processed subject to the UK GDPR: the UK, or a country or territory recognized as ensuring adequate protection under the UK GDPR and the Data Protection Act 2018; or
(c) for data processed subject to the Swiss FADP: Switzerland, or a country or territory that is: (i) included in the list of the states whose legislation ensures adequate protection as published by the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, if applicable; or (ii) recognized as ensuring adequate protection by the Swiss Federal Council under the Swiss FADP;
in each case, other than on the basis of an optional data protection framework.
“
Alternative Transfer Solution
” means a solution, other than SCCs, that enables the lawful transfer of personal data to a third country in accordance with European Data Protection Law, for example a data protection framework recognized as ensuring that participating entities provide adequate protection.
“
Customer SCCs
” means the SCCs (Controller-to-Processor), the SCCs (Processor-to-Processor), or the SCCs (Processor-to-Controller), as applicable.
“
SCCs
” means the Customer SCCs or SCCs (Processor-to-Processor, Google Exporter), as applicable.
“
SCCs (Controller-to-Processor)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/sccs/eu-c2p
“
SCCs (Processor-to-Controller)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/sccs/eu-p2c
“
SCCs (Processor-to-Processor)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/sccs/eu-p2p
“
SCCs (Processor-to-Processor, Google Exporter)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/sccs/eu-p2p-google-exporter
2.
Instruction Notifications.
Without prejudice to Google’s obligations under Section 5.2 (Compliance with Customer’s Instructions) or any other rights or obligations of either party under the applicable Agreement, Google will immediately notify Customer if, in Google’s opinion:
a. European Law prohibits Google from complying with an Instruction;
b. an Instruction does not comply with European Data Protection Law; or
c. Google is otherwise unable to comply with an Instruction,
in each case unless such notice is prohibited by European Law.
If Customer is a processor, Customer will immediately forward to the relevant controller any notice provided by Google under this section.
3. Customer’s Audit Rights.
Google will allow Customer or an independent auditor appointed by Customer to conduct audits (including inspections) as described in Section 7.5.2(a) (Customer Audit). During such an audit, Google will make available all information necessary to demonstrate compliance with its obligations under this Addendum and contribute to the audit as described in Section 7.5 (Reviews and Audits of Compliance) and this section.
4. Data Transfers.
4.1
Restricted Transfers.
The parties acknowledge that European Data Protection Law does not require SCCs or an Alternative Transfer Solution in order for Customer Personal Data to be processed in or transferred to an Adequate Country. If Customer Personal Data is transferred to any other country and European Data Protection Law applies to the transfers (as certified by Customer under Section 4.2 (Certification by Non-EMEA Customers) of these European Data Protection Law terms, if its billing address is outside EMEA) (“
Restricted Transfers
”), then:
a. if Google has adopted an Alternative Transfer Solution for any Restricted Transfers, Google will inform Customer of the relevant solution and ensure that such Restricted Transfers are made in accordance with it; or
b. if Google has not adopted an Alternative Transfer Solution for any Restricted Transfers, or informs Customer that Google is no longer adopting, an Alternative Transfer Solution for any Restricted Transfers (without adopting a replacement Alternative Transfer Solution):
i. if Google’s address is in an Adequate Country:
A. the SCCs (Processor-to-Processor, Google Exporter) will apply with respect to such Restricted Transfers from Google to Subprocessors; and
B. in addition, if Customer’s billing address is not in an Adequate Country, the SCCs (Processor-to Controller) will apply (regardless of whether Customer is a controller or processor) with respect to such Restricted Transfers between Google and Customer; or
ii. if Google’s address is not in an Adequate Country, the SCCs (Controller-to-Processor) or SCCs (Processor-to-Processor) will apply (according to whether Customer is a controller or processor) with respect to such Restricted Transfers between Google and Customer.
4.2
Certification by Non-EMEA Customers
. If Customer’s billing address is outside EMEA, and the processing of Customer Personal Data is subject to European Data Protection Law, then unless Appendix 4 (Specific Products) of this Addendum indicates otherwise, Customer will certify as such and identify its competent Supervisory Authority via the Admin Console for the applicable Services.
4.3
Information about Restricted Transfers
. Google will provide Customer with information relevant to Restricted Transfers, Additional Security Controls and other supplementary protective measures:
a. as described in Section 7.5.1 (Reviews of Security Documentation);
b. in any additional locations described in Appendix 4 (Specific Products); and
c. in relation to Google’s adoption of an Alternative Transfer Solution, at
https://cloud.google.com/terms/alternative-transfer-solution
.
4.4
SCC Audits
. If Customer SCCs apply as described in Section 4.1 (Restricted Transfers) of these European Data Protection Law terms, Google will allow Customer (or an independent auditor appointed by Customer) to conduct audits as described in those SCCs and, during an audit, make available all information required by those SCCs, both in accordance with Section 7.5.3 (Additional Business Terms for Reviews and Audits).
4.5
SCC Notices
. Customer will forward to the relevant controller promptly and without undue delay any notice that refers to any SCCs.
4.6
Termination Due to Data Transfer Risk
. If Customer concludes, based on its current or intended use of the Services, that appropriate safeguards are not provided for transferred Customer Personal Data, then Customer may immediately terminate the applicable Agreement in accordance with that Agreement's termination for convenience provision or, if there is no such provision, by notifying Google.
4.7
No Modification of SCCs
. Nothing in the Agreement (including this Addendum) is intended to modify or contradict any SCCs or prejudice the fundamental rights or freedoms of data subjects under European Data Protection Law.
4.8
Precedence of SCCs
. To the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between any Customer SCCs (which are incorporated by reference into this Addendum) and the remainder of the Agreement (including this Addendum), the Customer SCCs will prevail.
5. Requirements for Subprocessor Engagement.
European Data Protection Law requires Google to ensure via a written contract that the data protection obligations described in this Addendum, as referred to in Article 28(3) of the GDPR, if applicable, are imposed on any Subprocessor engaged by Google.
CCPA
1. Additional Definitions.
“
CCPA
” means the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended, including as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020, together with all implementing regulations.
“
Customer Personal Data
” includes “personal information”.
The terms “business”, “business purpose”, “consumer”, “personal information”, “processing”, “sale”, “sell”, “service provider”, and “share” have the meanings given in the CCPA.
2. Prohibitions.
Without prejudice to Google’s obligations under Section 5.2 (Compliance with Customer’s Instructions), with respect to the processing of Customer Personal Data in accordance with the CCPA, Google will not, unless otherwise permitted under the CCPA:
a. sell or share Customer Personal Data;
b. retain, use or disclose Customer Personal Data:
i. other than for a business purpose under the CCPA on behalf of Customer and for the specific purpose of performing the Services and TSS (if applicable); or
ii. outside of the direct business relationship between Google and Customer; or
c. combine or update Customer Personal Data with personal information that Google receives from or on behalf of a third party or collects from its own interactions with the consumer.
3. Compliance.
Without prejudice to Google’s obligations under Section 5.2 (Compliance with Customer’s Instructions) or any other rights or obligations of either party under the applicable Agreement, Google will notify Customer if, in Google’s opinion, Google is unable to meet its obligations under the CCPA, unless such notice is prohibited by applicable law.
4. Customer Intervention.
If Google notifies Customer of any unauthorized use of Customer Personal Data, including under Section 3 (Compliance) of this subsection or Section 7.2.1 (Incident Notification), Customer may take reasonable and appropriate steps to stop or remediate such unauthorized use by:
a. taking any measures recommended by Google pursuant to Section 7.2.2 (Details of Data Incident), if applicable; or
b. exercising its rights under Section 7.5.2(a) (Customer Audit) or 9.1 (Access; Rectification; Restricted Processing; Portability).
Turkey
1. Additional Definitions.
“
Turkish Data Protection Law
” means the Turkish Law on the Protection of Personal Data No. 6698 dated April 7, 2016.
“
Turkish Personal Data Protection Authority
” means the Kişisel Verileri Koruma Kurumu.
“
Turkish SCCs
” means standard contract clauses under Turkish Data Protection Law.
2. Data Transfers.
2.1
Supplementary Terms
. If Customer’s billing address is in Turkey and Google makes any optional additional terms (including Turkish SCCs) available for acceptance by Customer in relation to transfers of Customer Personal Data under Turkish Data Protection Law, those terms will supplement this Addendum as from the date they are notified to the Turkish Personal Data Protection Authority in accordance with Section 2.2 (Notification to the Competent Authority) below, as evidenced by Customer to Google.
2.2
Notification to the Competent Authority.
If Customer enters into Turkish SCCs under this Section 2 (Data Transfers), Customer will be responsible for notifying the Turkish Personal Data Protection Authority of use of Turkish SCCs within five (5) business days of signature of the Turkish SCCs as required by Turkish Data Protection Law.
2.3
SCC Audits
. If Customer enters into Turkish SCCs under this Section 2 (Data Transfers), Google will allow Customer (or an independent auditor appointed by Customer) to conduct audits as described in those SCCs and, during an audit, make available all information required by those SCCs, both in accordance with Section 7.5.3 (Additional Business Terms for Reviews and Audits).
2.4
Termination Due to Data Transfer Risk
. If Customer concludes, based on its current or intended use of the Services, that appropriate safeguards are not provided for transferred Customer Personal Data, then Customer may immediately terminate the applicable Agreement in accordance with that Agreement's termination for convenience provision or, if there is no such provision, by notifying Google.
2.5
No Modification of Turkish SCCs.
Nothing in the Agreement (including this Addendum) is intended to modify or contradict the Turkish SCCs or prejudice the fundamental rights or freedoms of data subjects under Turkish Data Protection Law.
2.6
Precedence of SCCs
. To the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between the Turkish SCCs (which will be incorporated by reference into this Addendum if entered into by Customer) and the remainder of the Agreement (including this Addendum), the Turkish SCCs will prevail.
Israel
1. Additional Definition.
“
Israeli Privacy Protection Law
” means the Israeli Privacy Protection Law, 1981 and any regulations promulgated thereunder.
2. Equivalent Terms.
Any terms equivalent to “controller”, “personal data”, “processing”, and “processor”, as used in this Addendum, have the meanings given in the Israeli Privacy Protection Law.
3. Customer’s Audit Rights.
Google will allow Customer or an independent auditor appointed by Customer to conduct audits (including inspections) as described in Section 7.5.2(a) (Customer Audit).
Appendix 4: Specific Products
The terms in each subsection of this Appendix 4 apply solely with respect to the processing of Customer Data by the corresponding Service(s).
Google Cloud Platform
1. Additional Definitions.
“
Account
”, if not defined in the Agreement, means Customer’s Google Cloud Platform account.
“
Customer Data
”, if not defined in the Agreement, means data provided to Google by Customer or End Users through Google Cloud Platform under the Account, and data that Customer or End Users derive from that data through their use of Google Cloud Platform.
“
Google Cloud Platform
” means the Google Cloud Platform services described at
https://cloud.google.com/terms/services
, excluding any Third-Party Offerings.
“
Third-Party Offerings
”, if not defined in the Agreement, means (a) third-party services, software, products, and other offerings that are not incorporated into Google Cloud Platform or Software, (b) offerings identified in the "Third-Party Terms" section of the Service Specific Terms of the Agreement, and (c) third-party operating systems.
2. Compliance Certifications.
The Compliance Certifications for Google Cloud Platform Audited Services will also include certificates for ISO 27017 and ISO 27018 and a PCI DSS Attestation of Compliance.
3. Data Center Locations.
The locations of Google Cloud Platform data centers are described at
https://cloud.google.com/about/locations/
.
4. Information about Subprocessors.
Names, locations, and activities of Google Cloud Platform Subprocessors are described at
https://cloud.google.com/terms/subprocessors
.
5. Cloud Data Protection Team.
The Data Protection Team for Google Cloud Platform can be contacted at
https://support.google.com/cloud/contact/dpo
.
6. Information about Restricted Transfers
. Additional information relevant to Restricted Transfers, Additional Security Controls and other supplementary protective measures is available at
cloud.google.com/privacy/
.
7. Service Specific Terms.
Bare Metal Solution (Google Cloud Platform)
Bare Metal Solution provides non-virtualized access to underlying infrastructure resources and, by design, has certain distinct characteristics.
1. Amendments.
This Addendum is amended as follows with respect to Bare Metal Solution:
The definition of "Google's Third-Party Auditor" is replaced with the following:
"
Google's Third-Party Auditor
” means a qualified and independent third-party auditor appointed by Google or a Bare Metal Solution Subprocessor, whose then-current identity Google will disclose to Customer on request.
The following terms are deleted:
From Section 7.1.1 (Google's Security Measures), the phrase "Encrypt Customer Data";
From Appendix 2 (Security Measures), the Section 1(a) subsections titled "Server Operating Systems" and "Business Continuity";
From Appendix 2, the Section 1(b) subsections titled "External Attack Surface," "Intrusion Detection," and "Encryption Technologies"; and
From Appendix 2, the following sentences of Section 3(a):
Google stores data in a multi-tenant environment on Google-owned servers. Subject to any Customer instructions to the contrary (for example, in the form of a data location selection), Google replicates Customer Data between multiple geographically dispersed data centers.
2. Compliance Certifications and SOC Reports.
Google or its Subprocessor will maintain at least the following (or an equivalent or enhanced alternative) for Bare Metal Solution to verify the continued effectiveness of the Security Measures:
a. a certificate for ISO 27001 and a PCI DSS Attestation of Compliance (the "
BMS Compliance Certifications
"); and
b. SOC 1
and SOC 2 reports updated annually based on an audit performed at least once every 12 months (the "
BMS SOC Reports
").
3. Reviews of Security Documentation.
To demonstrate compliance by Google with its obligations under this Addendum,
Google will make the BMS Compliance Certifications and BMS SOC Reports available for review by Customer and, if Customer is a processor, allow Customer to request access for the relevant controller to the BMS SOC Reports in accordance with Section 7.5.3 (Additional Business Terms for Reviews and Audits).
4. Customer Obligations.
Without limiting Google's express obligations related to Bare Metal Solution, Customer will take reasonable steps to protect and maintain the security of Customer Data and any other content stored on or processed through Bare Metal Solution.
5. Disclaimer.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement (including this Addendum), Google is not responsible for any of the following in relation to Bare Metal Solution:
a. non-physical security, such as access controls, encryption, firewalls, antivirus protection, threat detection, and security scanning;
b. logging and monitoring;
c. non-hardware maintenance or support;
d. data backup, including any redundancy or high-availability configuration; or
e. business continuity and disaster recovery policies or procedures.
Customer is solely responsible for securing (other than physical security of Bare Metal Solution servers), logging and monitoring, maintaining and supporting, and backing up any Operating Systems, Customer Data, software, and applications Customer uses with, uploads to, or hosts on Bare Metal Solution.
Cloud NGFW (Google Cloud Platform)
The edition of Cloud NGFW titled “Cloud NGFW Enterprise” (“CNE”) is designed to mitigate cybersecurity risks and, as such, has certain distinct characteristics.
1. Amendments.
The Addendum is amended as follows with respect to CNE:
Sections 6.1 (Deletion by Customer) and 6.2 (Return or Deletion When Term Ends) will not prevent Google or Subprocessors from retaining any file or network traffic packet capture submitted for TSS purposes and designated by CNE as a security threat, provided that the file or network traffic packet capture does not include Customer Personal Data.
Google Distributed Cloud connected (Google Cloud Platform)
Google Distributed Cloud connected is not deployed at a Google data center and, by design, has certain distinct characteristics.
1. Amendments.
This Addendum is amended as follows with respect to Google Distributed Cloud connected:
References to “Google’s systems” are replaced with “the Equipment."
Section 6.2 (Return or Deletion When Term Ends) is replaced with the following:
6.2
Return or Deletion at the end of the Term
. Customer instructs Google to delete all remaining Customer Data (including existing copies) from the Equipment at the end of the Term in accordance with applicable law. If Customer wishes to retain any Customer Data after the end of the Term, it may export or make copies of such data prior to the end of the Term. Google will comply with the Instruction in this Section 6.2 as soon as reasonably practicable and within a maximum period of 180 days, unless European Law requires storage, where European Data Protection Law applies, or applicable law requires storage, where any other Applicable Privacy Law applies.
The following words are added to the end of Section 10.1 (Data Storage and Processing Facilities): “or where the Customer Location is located.”
Section 1 (Data Center and Network Security) of Appendix 2 (Security Measures) is replaced with the following:
1. Local Machines and Network Security
Local Machines
. Customer Data is solely stored on the Equipment to be deployed in a Customer Location.
Server Operating Systems
. Google servers use a Linux based implementation customized for the application environment. Google employs a code review process to increase the security of the code used to provide Google Distributed Cloud connected and enhance the security products in Google Distributed Cloud connected production environments.
Encryption Technologies
. Google makes HTTPS encryption (also referred to as SSL or TLS connection) available and allows for encryption of data in transit. Google servers support ephemeral elliptic curve Diffie-Hellman cryptographic key exchange signed with RSA and ECDSA. These perfect forward secrecy (PFS) methods help protect traffic and minimize the impact of a compromised key, or a cryptographic breakthrough. Google also makes encryption of data at rest available, using at least AES128 or similar. Google Distributed Cloud connected has a CMEK integration; more information can be found at
https://cloud.google.com/kms/docs/cmek
.
Connection to Cloud VPN
. Google allows Customer to enable and configure a strong, encrypted interconnection between the Equipment and Customer's Virtual Private Cloud using Cloud VPN through an IPSEC VPN connection.
Bound Storage
. Customer's data storage is bound to the server. Should a disk be stolen or copied at rest, the contents of such disk will be unrecoverable outside of the server.
Sections 2 (Access and Site Controls) and 3 (Data) of Appendix 2 (Security Measures) are deleted.
2. Inapplicable Provisions.
Any Google obligations in the Agreement (including this Addendum) or statements in associated security documentation (including whitepapers) that depend on Google’s operation of a Google data center do not apply to Google Distributed Cloud connected.
Google-Managed Multi-Cloud (Google Cloud Platform)
Google-Managed Multi-Cloud Services involve third-party infrastructure and, by design, have certain distinct characteristics.
1. Additional Definition.
“
Google-Managed MCS Data Processing Amendment
” means the terms at
https://cloud.google.com/terms/mcs-data-processing-terms
.
2. Multi-Cloud Data Processing Terms.
The Google-Managed MCS Data Processing Amendment supplements and amends this Addendum with respect to Google-Managed Multi-Cloud Services for Google Cloud Platform.
Google Cloud VMware Engine (Google Cloud Platform)
Google may not have access to Customer's VMware environment or be able to encrypt personal data in Customer's VMware environment.
NetApp Volumes (Google Cloud Platform)
1. Amendments.
This Addendum is amended as follows with respect to NetApp Volumes:
The definition of "Google's Third-Party Auditor" is replaced with the following:
"
Google's Third Party Auditor
” means a qualified and independent third party auditor appointed by Google or a NetApp Volumes Subprocessor, whose then-current identity Google will disclose to Customer on request.
Section 3(a) (Data Storage, Isolation and Logging) of Appendix 2 (Security Measures) is replaced with the following:
(a)
Data Storage, Isolation and Logging
. Google stores data in a multi-tenant environment on servers owned by NetApp, Inc. Subject to any Instructions to the contrary (e.g. in the form of a data location selection), Google replicates Customer Data between multiple geographically dispersed data centers. Google also logically isolates Customer Data. Customer will be given control over specific data sharing policies. Those policies, in accordance with the functionality of the Services, will enable Customer to determine the product sharing settings applicable to its End Users for specific purposes. Customer may choose to use logging functionality that Google makes available via the Services.
2. Compliance Certifications and SOC Reports
. Google or its Subprocessor will obtain at least the following (or an equivalent or enhanced alternative) for NetApp Volumes:
a. a certificate for ISO 27001 and a PCI DSS Attestation of Compliance (the "
NetApp Compliance Certifications
"); and
b. SOC 1 and SOC 2 Reports updated annually based on an audit performed at least once every 12 months (the "
NetApp SOC Reports
").
3. Reviews of Security Documentation
. To demonstrate compliance by Google with its obligations under this Addendum, Google will make any NetApp Compliance Certifications and NetApp SOC Reports available for review by Customer and, if Customer is a processor, allow Customer to request access for the relevant controller to the NetApp SOC Reports in accordance with Section 7.5.3 (Additional Business Terms for Reviews and Audits).
Google Workspace and Cloud Identity
1. Additional Definitions.
“
Account
”, if not defined in the Agreement, means Customer’s Google Workspace or Cloud Identity account.
“
Cloud Identity
” when purchased under a standalone Agreement and not as part of Google Cloud Platform or Google Workspace, means the Cloud Identity Services described at
https://cloud.google.com/terms/identity/user-features
.
“
Customer Data
”, if not defined in the Agreement, means data submitted, stored, sent or received by or on behalf of Customer or its End Users via Google Workspace or Cloud Identity under the Account.
“
Google Workspace
”
means the Google Workspace or Google Workspace for Education services described at
https://workspace.google.com/terms/user_features.html
, as applicable.
2. Additional Products.
If Google at its option makes Additional Products available to Customer for use with Google Workspace or Cloud Identity in accordance with applicable Additional Product Terms:
a. Customer may enable or disable Additional Products via the Admin Console and will not need to use Additional Products in order to use Google Workspace or Cloud Identity; and
b. if Customer opts to install any Additional Products or to use them with Google Workspace or Cloud Identity, the Additional Products may access Customer Data as required to interoperate with Google Workspace or Cloud Identity, as applicable.
For clarity, this Addendum does not apply to the processing of personal data in connection with the provision of any Additional Products installed or used by Customer, including personal data transmitted to or from such Additional Products.
3. Compliance Certifications.
The Compliance Certifications for Google Workspace and Cloud Identity Audited Services will also include certificates for ISO 27017 and ISO 27018.
4. Data Center Locations.
The locations of Google Workspace and Cloud Identity data centers are described at
https://www.google.com/about/datacenters/locations/
.
5. Information about Subprocessors.
Names, locations, and activities of Google Workspace and Cloud Identity Subprocessors are described at
https://workspace.google.com/intl/en/terms/subprocessors.html
.
6. Cloud Data Protection Team.
The Data Protection Team for Google Workspace and Cloud Identity (while Administrators are signed in to their Admin Account) can be contacted at
https://support.google.com/a/contact/googlecloud_dpr
.
7. Additional Security Measures.
For Google Workspace and Cloud Identity:
a. Google logically separates each End User’s data from the data of other End Users; and
b. data for an authenticated End User will not be displayed to another End User (unless the former End User or an Administrator allows the data to be shared).
8. Information about Restricted Transfers
. Additional information relevant to Restricted Transfers, Additional Security Controls and other supplementary protective measures is available at
cloud.google.com/privacy/
.
9. Service Data Addendum.
If Google makes an optional Service Data Addendum available for acceptance by Customer in relation to this Addendum, availability of that optional addendum will constitute a “DPA Update” if such term is defined in any Service Data Addendum previously entered into by Customer.
10. Service Specific Terms.
AppSheet (Google Workspace)
1. Amendments.
This Addendum is amended as follows with respect to AppSheet:
The paragraph titled “Server Operating Systems” in Section 1(a) of Appendix 2 (Security Measures) is replaced with the following:
Server Operating Systems
. Google servers use a Linux based implementation customized for the application environment.
2. Additional Data Center Locations.
Additional data center locations for AppSheet are described at
https://cloud.google.com/about/locations/
.
Looker (original)
1. Additional Definitions.
“
Admin Console
” means any admin console applicable to each Instance.
“
Google-Managed MCS Data Processing Amendment
” means, if applicable, the terms at
https://cloud.google.com/terms/mcs-data-processing-terms
.
“
Google-Managed Multi-Cloud Services
” means, if applicable, specified Google services, products and features that are hosted on the infrastructure of a third party cloud provider.
“
Looker (original)
” means an integrated platform (including cloud-based infrastructure, if applicable, and software components including any associated APIs) that enables businesses to analyze data and define business metrics across multiple data sources made available by Google to Customer under the Agreement. Looker (original) excludes Third-Party Offerings.
“
Multi-Cloud Service Third-P
arty
Provider
” has the meaning given in the Google-Managed MCS Data Processing Amendment.
“
Order Form
” has the meaning given in the Agreement, unless Customer has purchased via a reseller or online marketplace or is using Looker only for trial or evaluation purposes under a trial or evaluation agreement, in which case Order Form may mean another written form (email or other electronic means permitted) as authorized by Google.
2. Amendments.
This Addendum is amended as follows with respect to Looker (original):
The definition of “Notification Email Address” is replaced with the following:
”Notification Email Address”
means the email address(es) designated by Customer in the Order Form or via Looker (as applicable) to receive certain notifications from Google.
The definitions of “SCCs (Controller-to-Processor)”, “SCCs (Processor-to-Controller)”, “SCCs (Processor-to-Processor)” and “SCCs (Processor-to-Processor, Google Exporter)” in Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws) are replaced with the following:
“
SCCs (Controller-to-Processor)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/looker/legal/sccs/eu-c2p
;
“
SCCs (Processor-to-Controller)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/looker/legal/sccs/eu-p2c
;
“
SCCs (Processor-to-Processor)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/looker/legal/sccs/eu-p2p
; and
“
SCCs (Processor-to-Processor, Google Exporter)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/looker/legal/sccs/eu-p2p-intra-group
.
The following words are added to the end of Section 10.1 (Data Storage and Processing Facilities): “or where any Multi-Cloud Service Third-Party Providers maintain facilities.”
3. Additional Customer Security Responsibilities.
Customer is responsible for the security of Customer's environment, databases, and configuration for Looker (original) excluding systems managed and controlled by Google.
4. Compliance Certifications and SOC Reports.
The Compliance Certifications and SOC Reports for Looker (original) Audited Services may vary according to the hosting environment in which the relevant Services are used. Google will provide details of the Compliance Certifications and SOC Reports available for specific hosting environments on request.
5. Data Center Locations.
The locations of Looker (original) data centers will be described on the applicable Order Form or otherwise identified by Google.
6. No Certification by Non-EMEA Customers.
Customer is not obliged to certify or identify its competent Supervisory Authority as described in Section 4.2 (Certification by Non-EMEA Customers) of the European Data Protection terms in Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws) for Looker (original).
7. Information about Restricted Transfers.
Additional information relevant to Restricted Transfers, Additional Security Controls and other supplementary protective measures for Looker (original) is available at
https://docs.looker.com
.
8. Information about Subprocessors.
Names, locations and activities of Subprocessors for Looker (original) are described at:
a.
https://cloud.google.com/terms/looker/privacy/lookeroriginal-subprocessors
and
b.
https://cloud.google.com/terms/subprocessors
.
9. Google-Managed Multi-Cloud (Looker (original))
Google-Managed Multi-Cloud Services involve third-party infrastructure and, by design, have certain distinct characteristics.
9.1
Multi-Cloud Data Processing Terms
. The Google-Managed MCS Data Processing Amendment supplements and amends this Addendum with respect to Google-Managed Multi-Cloud Services for Looker (original).
10. Cloud Data Protection Team.
The Data Protection Team for Looker (original) can be contacted at
https://support.google.com/cloud/contact/dpo
.
11. Google’s Processing Records.
To the extent any Applicable Privacy Law requires Google to collect and maintain records of certain information relating to Customer, Customer will supply such information to Google upon request, and notify Google of any updates required to keep such information accurate and up-to-date, unless Google requests that Customer supply and update such information via another means.
12. Additional Application Security Measures.
Google will implement and maintain the additional Security Measures described below for Looker (original):
a. Google follows at least industry standard practices for security architecture. Proxy servers used for Google’s applications help secure access to Looker by providing a single point to filter attacks through IP denylisting and connection rate limiting.
b. Customer administrators control access to applications by Google personnel to provide technical support requested by Customer or End Users.
SecOps Services
1. Additional Definitions.
“
Account
”, if not defined in the Agreement, means Customer’s SecOps Services or Google Cloud Platform account, as applicable.
“
Customer Data
”, if not defined in the Agreement, means data provided to Google by Customer or End Users through SecOps Services under the Account or, for Mandiant Consulting Services and Managed Services, in connection with receiving SecOps Services.
“
Customer-Engaged Provider
” means a service provider (which may include a processor or subprocessor) directly engaged by Customer under a separate agreement between Customer and such provider.
“
SecOps Services
” means the SecOps Services described at
https://cloud.google.com/terms/secops/services
, excluding any Third-Party Offerings.
“
Third-Party Offerings
”, if not defined in the Agreement, means (a) third-party services, software, products, and other offerings that are not incorporated into SecOps Services or Software, and (b) third-party operating systems.
2. Amendments.
This Addendum is amended as follows with respect to SecOps Services:
The definition of "Additional Security Controls” is replaced with the following:
“Additional Security Controls”
means security resources, features, functionality and/or controls (if any) that Customer may use at its option and/or as it determines, including (if any) encryption, logging and monitoring, identity and access management,
and security scanning.
The definition of “Audited Services” is replaced with the following:
“
Audited Services
” means the then-current SecOps Services indicated as being in-scope for the relevant certification or report at
https://cloud.google.com/security/compliance/secops/services-in-scope
. Google may not remove any SecOps Services from this URL unless they have been discontinued in accordance with the applicable Agreement.
The definitions of “SCCs (Controller-to-Processor)”, “SCCs (Processor-to-Controller)”, “SCCs (Processor-to-Processor)” and “SCCs (Processor-to-Processor, Google Exporter)” in Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws) are replaced with the following:
“SCCs (Controller-to-Processor)”
means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/secops/sccs/eu-c2p
;
“SCCs (Processor-to-Controller)”
means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/secops/sccs/eu-p2c
;
“SCCs (Processor-to-Processor)”
means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/secops/sccs/eu-p2p
; and
“SCCs (Processor-to-Processor, Google Exporter)”
means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/secops/sccs/eu-p2p-google-exporter
.
Section 6.1 (Deletion by Customer) is modified to read as follows:
6.1
Deletion by Customer
. Google will enable Customer to delete Customer Data during the Term in a manner consistent with the functionality of the Services or upon request. If Customer uses the Services to delete any Customer Data during the Term and that Customer Data cannot be recovered by Customer, or if Customer requests deletion of any Customer Data during the Term, this use or request (as applicable) will constitute an Instruction to Google to delete the relevant Customer Data from Google’s systems in accordance with applicable law. Google will comply with this Instruction as soon as reasonably practicable and within a maximum period of 180 days, unless European Law requires storage, where European Data Protection Law applies, or applicable law requires storage, where any other Applicable Privacy Law applies.
Section 7.4 (Compliance Certifications and SOC Reports) of the Addendum is modified to read as follows:
7.4
Compliance Certifications and SOC Reports
. Google will maintain at least the certifications and reports as identified at
https://cloud.google.com/security/compliance/secops/services-in-scope
for the Audited Services to verify the continued effectiveness of the Security Measures (the “
Compliance Certifications
” and “
SOC Reports
”).
Google may add standards at any time. Google may replace a Compliance Certification or SOC Report with an equivalent or enhanced alternative.
Section 9.1 (Access; Rectification; Restricted Processing; Portability) is modified to read as follows:
9.1
Access; Rectification; Restricted Processing; Portability
. During the Term, Google will enable Customer, in a manner consistent with the functionality of the Services, to access, rectify and restrict processing of Customer Data, including as described in Section 6.1 (Deletion by Customer), and to export Customer Data upon request. If Customer becomes aware that any Customer Personal Data is inaccurate or outdated, Customer will be responsible for notifying Google and Google will assist Customer in rectifying that data if required by Applicable Privacy Law.
3. Data Center Locations.
The locations of SecOps Services data centers are described at
https://cloud.google.com/terms/secops/data-residency
.
4. No Certification by Non-EMEA Customers.
Customer is not obliged to certify or identify its competent Supervisory Authority as described in Section 4.2 (Certification by Non-EMEA Customers) of the European Data Protection terms in Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws) for SecOps Services.
5. Information about Subprocessors.
Names, locations, and activities of Subprocessors for SecOps Services are described at
https://cloud.google.com/terms/secops/subprocessors
.
6. Cloud Data Protection Team.
The Data Protection Team for SecOps Services can be contacted at
https://support.google.com/cloud/contact/dpo
(and/or via such other means as Google may provide from time to time).
7. Google’s Processing Records.
To the extent any Applicable Privacy Law requires Google to collect and maintain records of certain information relating to Customer, Customer will supply such information to Google upon request, and notify Google of any updates required to keep such information accurate and up-to-date, unless Google requests that Customer supply and update such information via another means.
8. Service Specific Terms.
Mandiant Consulting Services and Managed Services
Mandiant Consulting Services and Managed Services provide advisory and implementation services (including incident response, strategic readiness, and technical assurance to mitigate threats and reduce incident-related risks) and managed detection and response services and by design, have certain distinct characteristics.
1. Amendments.
The Addendum is amended as follows solely with respect to Mandiant Consulting Services and Managed Services:
The definition of “Data Incident” is supplemented with the following:
For clarity, Data Incident excludes incidents that are the subject of the Mandiant Consulting Services and/or Managed Services, as applicable.
Section 5.2(b)(i) (Compliance with Customer’s Instructions) is replaced with the following:
i. Customer’s use of the Services; and
The second sentence of Section 7.1.1 (Google’s Security Measures) is modified to read as follows:
The Security Measures may include (as appropriate) measures to encrypt Customer Data; to help ensure ongoing confidentiality, integrity, availability and resilience of Google’s systems and services; to help restore timely access to Customer Data following an incident; and for regular testing of effectiveness.
Section 7.3.1(b) is modified to read as follows:
b. administering, managing access to and securing the account authentication credentials, systems, software, networks and devices that Customer uses to receive, or authorizes Google to access in order to provide, the Mandiant Consulting Services and/or Managed Services, as applicable;
New Sections 7.3.1(d) and (e) are added as follows:
d. minimizing the amount of Customer Data provided by or on behalf of Customer to Google; and
e. to the extent Google’s access to Customer Data is within Customer’s control, revoking that access when Google has completed the Mandiant Consulting Services and/or Managed Services, as applicable.
Appendix 2 (Security Measures) is replaced with the following:
Appendix 2: Additional Technical and Organizational Measures
1. Customer-Controlled Environment. Google will only access and process Customer Data provided by or on behalf of Customer to Google via a Customer-controlled or Customer-approved account or environment.
2. Data Access Processes and Policies – Access Policy. Google’s data access processes and policies are designed to prevent unauthorized persons and/or systems from gaining access to systems used to process Customer Data. Google (i) only allows persons to access data they are authorized to access; and (ii) takes steps to ensure that personal data cannot be read, copied, altered or removed without authorization during processing and use. Google’s granting or modification of access rights is based on Customer’s provision to Google of end user access to its account or environment.
3. Personnel Security. Google personnel are required to conduct themselves in a manner consistent with the company’s guidelines regarding confidentiality, business ethics, appropriate usage, and professional standards. Google conducts reasonably appropriate background checks to the extent legally permissible and in accordance with applicable local labor law and statutory regulations.
Personnel are required to execute a confidentiality agreement and must acknowledge receipt of, and compliance with, Google’s confidentiality and privacy policies. Personnel are provided with security training. Personnel handling Customer Data are required to complete additional requirements appropriate to their role (e.g., certifications). Google’s personnel will not process Customer Data without authorization.
4. Additional Security Measures. Google and Customer may agree to additional security measures in the applicable Order Form, including any attached Statement of Work, for the Mandiant Consulting Services and/or Managed Services, as applicable.
2.
Customer-Engaged Provider.
For clarity, and without limiting Google’s obligations under Section 7 (Data Security) or 11 (Subprocessors), Appendix 2 (Security Measures) does not describe the security measures or controls implemented or provided by Customer or Customer-Engaged Providers.
Implementation Services
1. Additional
Definitions.
“
Customer Data
” means data that Customer authorizes Google Personnel to access on Customer-Managed Systems.
“
Customer-Managed Systems
” means the following, as used by Customer to receive Implementation Services: (a) Customer-managed instances of Google Cloud Services or third-party cloud services; and (b) any hardware or software hosted or managed in Customer’s on-premises environment.
"Google Cloud Services
" means any Services described in this Appendix 4 (Specific Products), other than Implementation Services, Mandiant Consulting Services and Mandiant Managed Services.
“
Google Personnel
” means Google employees and contractors engaged in providing Implementation Services.
“
Implementation Services
” means advisory, consulting and implementation services provided by Google employees and contractors in support of Google Cloud Services as described in the Agreement, including in an Order Form or a Statement of Work.
2. Amendments
. This Addendum is amended as follows with respect to Implementation Services:
The definition of "Additional Security Controls” is deleted.
The definition of “Data Incident” is replaced with the following:
“
Data Incident
” means a breach of Section 7.1 (Google’s Security Measures, Controls and Assistance) by Google Personnel, leading to the accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, Customer Personal Data.
Subject to the remainder of this section, the term “Customer Data” is replaced with “Customer Personal Data” when used (a) in Section 2 (Definitions) in the definition of “Subprocessor”, and (b) in other sections of this Addendum. For clarity, other definitions in Section 2 (Definitions) remain unamended.
Section 3 (Duration) is replaced with the following:
3. Duration
. Regardless of whether the applicable Agreement has terminated or expired, this Addendum will remain in effect until, and automatically expire when, Google no longer has access to any Customer Personal Data.
Section 6 (Data Deletion) is replaced with the following:
6. Data Deletion.
At the end of the Term, Customer will (a) determine whether to delete any Customer Personal Data, and (b) be responsible for any such deletion.
The second sentence of Section 7.1.1 (Google’s Security Measures) is replaced with the following:
“The Security Measures may include (as appropriate) measures to encrypt Customer Data; to help ensure ongoing confidentiality, integrity, availability and resilience of Google’s systems and services; to help restore timely access to Customer Data following an incident; and for regular testing of effectiveness.”
Section 7.1.3 (Additional Security Controls) is deleted, together with all other references to that section.
Section 9.1 (Access; Rectification; Restricted Processing; Portability) is replaced with the following:
9.1
Access; Rectification; Restricted Processing; Portability
. Customer will be responsible for using the functionality of the Customer-Managed Systems to access, rectify and restrict processing of Customer Personal Data, including if Customer becomes aware that any Customer Personal Data is inaccurate or outdated and is required by Applicable Privacy Law to rectify or delete that data.
Section 11.4 (Opportunity to Object to Subprocessors) is replaced with the following:
11.4
Opportunity to Object to Subprocessors
. When any New Subprocessor is engaged during the Term, Google will notify Customer of the engagement of the New Subprocessor before it processes Customer Personal Data. Customer may object to the New Subprocessor by notifying Google and, if Customer does so, the parties will work in good faith to determine a mutually acceptable alternative.
Appendix 1 (Subject Matter and Details of Data Processing) is amended as follows:
The “Duration of the Processing” section is replaced with the following:
“Duration of the Processing.
The Term plus (if applicable) the period from the end of the Term until the expiry of Google’s access to any Customer Personal Data.”
The words “provided to Google via the Services” in the “Categories of Data” and “Data Subjects” sections are replaced with “made accessible to Google in connection with the Services”.
Appendix 2 (Security Measures) is replaced with the following:
Appendix 2: Security Measures
1. Customer-Managed Systems.
Google Personnel will only access and process Customer Personal Data on Customer-Managed Systems. If those systems include Google Cloud Services, Customer’s use of Google Cloud Services remains governed by the agreement applicable to those services.
2. Access Control.
Google’s internal data access processes and policies are designed to prevent unauthorized persons and systems from gaining access to Google Cloud Services used to process personal data. Google policies (i) only allow Google Personnel to access data they are authorized to access; and (ii) require that Google Personnel do not read, copy, alter or remove Customer Personal Data without authorization during processing, use and after recording. Customer controls the provisioning or modification of end user access rights to Customer-Managed Systems. If those systems include Google Cloud Services, details regarding workflow tools that maintain audit records of changes and system access logs are addressed in the agreement for the applicable Google Cloud Services.
3. Personnel Security.
Google Personnel are required to conduct themselves in a manner consistent with the company’s guidelines regarding confidentiality, business ethics, appropriate usage, and professional standards. Google conducts reasonably appropriate background checks to the extent legally permissible and in accordance with applicable local labor law and statutory regulations.
Google Personnel are required to execute a confidentiality agreement and must acknowledge receipt of, and compliance with, Google’s confidentiality and privacy policies. Google Personnel are provided with security training. Google Personnel handling Customer Personal Data are required to complete additional requirements appropriate to their role (e.g., certifications).
4.
Additional Security Measures.
Google and Customer may agree to additional security measures in the Agreement, including in an Order Form or a Statement of Work.
5. Subprocessor Security.
Before onboarding Subprocessors, Google conducts an audit of the security and privacy practices of Subprocessors to ensure Subprocessors provide a level of security and privacy appropriate to their access to data and the scope of the services they are engaged to provide. Once Google has assessed the risks presented by the Subprocessor, then subject to the requirements described in Section 11.3 (Requirements for Subprocessor Engagement), the Subprocessor is required to enter into appropriate security, confidentiality and privacy contract terms.
3. Customer Security Responsibilities
. In addition to its obligations under Section 7.3.1 (Customer’s Security Responsibilities), Customer is responsible for the following:
administering, managing access to, and securing Customer-Managed Systems, including minimizing Google Personnel’s access to Customer Personal Data to the extent reasonably practicable and terminating that access on completion of the Implementation Services; and
implementing any security recommendations provided in writing by Google to Customer with respect to Customer-Managed Systems.
4. Compliance Certification.
Google will maintain certificates for ISO 27001, ISO 27017 and ISO 27018 covering Implementation Services provided in support of Google Cloud Platform and Google Workspace (the “
Implementation Services Compliance Certifications
”). Google may add standards at any time. Google may replace an Implementation Services Compliance Certification with an equivalent or enhanced alternative.
5. Reviews of Compliance Certification.
To demonstrate compliance by Google with its obligations under this Addendum, Google will make the Implementation Services Compliance Certification available for review by Customer and, if Customer is a processor, allow Customer to request access for the relevant controller to the Implementation Services Compliance Certification.
6. Data Processing Locations.
Customer Personal Data may be processed in any country where Google provides Implementation Services or where Customer maintains Customer-Managed Systems.
7. No Certification by Non-EMEA Customers.
Customer is not obliged to certify or identify its competent Supervisory Authority as described in Section 4.2 (Certification by Non-EMEA Customers) of the European Data Protection terms in Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws) for Implementation Services.
8. Information about Subprocessors.
Subprocessors for Implementation Services will be identified (as subcontractors) in an applicable Order Form, Statement of Work, or other confirmation provided to Customer before commencement of the Implementation Services or will be Google Affiliates. Google will also make names, locations and activities of Subprocessors for Implementation Services available to Customer upon request.
9. Google’s Processing Records.
To the extent any Applicable Privacy Law requires Google to collect and maintain records of certain information relating to Customer, Customer will supply such information to Google upon request, and notify Google of any updates required to keep such information accurate and up-to-date, unless Google requests that Customer supply and update such information via another means.
Google Cloud Skills Boost for Organizations
1. Additional Definitions.
“
Account
”, if not defined in the Agreement, means Customer’s Google Cloud Skills Boost for Organizations Customer Account.
"
GCSBO
" means educational, training, and learning services and content provided through
https://www.cloudskillsboost.google/
(or another website operated or controlled by Google and used for purposes of Google Cloud Skills Boost for Organizations).
“
TSS
” means technical support services that Google, in its discretion, may provide to Customer.
2. Amendments.
This Addendum is amended as follows with respect to GCSBO:
The definition of "Additional Security Controls” is replaced with the following:
“
Additional Security Controls
” means security resources, features, functionality and/or controls (if any) that Customer may use at its option and/or as it determines, including (if any) encryption, logging and monitoring, identity and access management, and security scanning.
The definitions of “SCCs (Controller-to-Processor)”, “SCCs (Processor-to-Controller)”, “SCCs (Processor-to-Processor)” and “SCCs (Processor-to-Processor, Google Exporter)” in Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws) are replaced with the following:
“
SCCs (Controller-to-Processor)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/skillsboost-organizations/sccs/eu-c2p
;
“
SCCs (Processor-to-Controller)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/skillsboost-organizations/sccs/eu-p2c
;
“
SCCs (Processor-to-Processor)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/skillsboost-organizations/sccs/eu-p2p
; and
“
SCCs (Processor-to-Processor, Google Exporter)
” means the terms at:
https://cloud.google.com/terms/skillsboost-organizations/sccs/eu-p2p-intra-group
.
3. Data Center Locations.
The locations of GCSBO data centers are described at
https://cloud.google.com/about/locations/
.
4. No Certification by Non-EMEA Customers.
Customer is not obliged to certify or identify its competent Supervisory Authority as described in Section 4.2 (Certification by Non-EMEA Customers) of the European Data Protection terms in Appendix 3 (Specific Privacy Laws) for GCSBO.
5. Information about Subprocessors.
Names, locations, and activities of GCSBO Subprocessors are described at:
a.
https://cloud.google.com/terms/skillsboost-organizations/subprocessors
; and
b.
https://cloud.google.com/terms/subprocessors
.
6. Cloud Data Protection Team.
The Data Protection Team for GCSBO can be contacted at
https://support.google.com/qwiklabs
(and/or via such other means as Google may provide from time to time).
7. Google’s Processing Records.
To the extent any Applicable Privacy Law requires Google to collect and maintain records of certain information relating to Customer, Customer will supply such information to Google upon request, and notify Google of any updates required to keep such information accurate and up-to-date, unless Google requests that Customer supply and update such information via another means.
Previous versions of Data Processing and Security Terms:
April 9, 2024
June 30, 2022
September 24, 2021
August 19, 2020
August 10, 2020
July 17, 2020
October 11, 2019
October 1, 2019
May 25, 2018
March 13, 2018
November 9, 2017
October 11, 2017
February 7, 2017
October 6, 2016
Previous versions of Data Processing Amendment:
July 7, 2022
September 24, 2021
May 27, 2021
October 29, 2019
May 25, 2018
April 25, 2018
July 11, 2017
November 28, 2016
January 7, 2016
April 24, 2015
April 1, 2014
November 14, 2012
Previous versions of Data Processing Addendum for Looker (original) Services (Customers):
February 14, 2023
January 4, 2023
September 20, 2022
June 30, 2022
March 16, 2022
September 24, 2021
April 1, 2021
January 15, 2021
December 17, 2020
August 28, 2020
June 1, 2020
March 9, 2020
Previous versions of SecOps Services DPST (Customers):
February 6, 2023
November 28, 2022
September 27, 2021
October 1, 2020
Previous versions of Data Processing Addendum for SecOps Consulting Services and Managed Services:
October 5, 2023
September 19, 2023
June 15, 2023
February 22, 2023
February 6, 2023
Previous versions
(Last modified October 15, 2024)
September 26, 2024
September 9, 2024
August 5, 2024
May 23, 2024
April 9, 2024
November 8, 2023
August 15, 2023
September 20, 2022